My windows are tinted so dark, you can't see what is in my car. Great anti-theft deterrent.
most definitely! 
I will now refer to all good sandwiches as "off the chain."
never got that joke from the movie. he's a virgin - he has clearly gotten with women before though. just because he hasn't fucked doesn't mean that he has never squeezed a damn titty.  is there a man above the age of 18 who has actually never squeezed the boob of a woman he finds attractive?
You must be new here.
I had a 50/50 chance of knowing what this was. 
Let's get the campaign started now to get him to win Motor Trend Car of the Year.
Always reminded me of Flea from RHCP
I really like this one.  I particularly could relate to: &gt;My words are too heavy  To carry any distance  So I keep them to myself  In my little hiding place
That's garbage. Failure is *always* an option. How many failed attempts do you suppose there were when trying to get to the moon? We learn from failure and bad experiences. If you wait for everything to be perfect, you'll either wait forever, or you'll just set yourself up for disappointment when you find out that what you thought was perfect, really wasn't.
Do you think there is anything wrong with what I've done here? I agree with you some are badly made and designed but some are really elegant!  http://i.imgur.com/lYqZ6.jpg
Planetarium!
[](/edgypost)
From the exif data on your Flickr images. It also contains your address, phone number, when you leave the house in the morning, where you like to shop, etc.
Religion does not own the idea of marriage. Marriage is not a religious institution. 
Confirmed.
Here is the text from this meme pic for anybody who needs it: &gt;Title: Joseph's YOLO &gt;Meme: Joseph Ducreux &gt;* #TVSBO  &gt;* THINE VITALITY SUBSISTS BUT ONCE &gt; ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||%23TVSBO+-+THINE+VITALITY+SUBSISTS+BUT+ONCE)] This is helpful for people who can't reach Quickmeme because of work/school firewalls or site downtime, and many other reasons ([FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/)). More info is available [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/).
Names don't get taken, they aren't unique.
I'm sure his friend was getting ready to rubble after seeing this
Did you by chance play on Mal'Ganis?  Had a very, very similar experience back in vanilla...
or alternatively the referees are drunk and high and the players are completely sober and playing for 1 million dollars in prize money. The possibilities are endless.
Especially Chewie?
Oh. Ha ha. This joke... again.  it sucks being old... :-/
Especially babies.
Here is the text from this meme pic for anybody who needs it: &gt;Title: Arnie on upgrades &gt;Meme: Terminator &gt;* I'LL NEVER UPGRADE TO WINDOWS 7  &gt;* I STILL LOVE VISTA, BABY &gt; ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||I%27LL+NEVER+UPGRADE+TO+WINDOWS+7+-+I+STILL+LOVE+VISTA%2C+BABY)] This is helpful for people who can't reach Quickmeme because of work/school firewalls or site downtime, and many other reasons ([FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/)). More info is available [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/).
Once again, as an American, it's a very skewed and media-heavy relationship I have. My mother woke up incredibly early (6AM our time, I believe) to watch Charles and Diana's, and did the same with William and Kates. I caught the actually vows, and I noticed that THIS is what a King and Queen should look like. William is a man of his people, I feel. He went to a college like a normal human being, spent time in the military like a commoner, and it seems he has many friends that are not royal. As someone that doesn't know him, but can simply just view it from across an ocean, I hope he becomes the ruler some day. He, unlike his idiot of a father, seems brilliant.   I have to agree that his mother played a massive role in this, but realize, those children were small when Diana died, but damn it, she was fantastic, and I think that, IIRC, Diana herself was a commoner.   While many traditionalists would say this is bad, every few generations NEEDS a commoner to the throne, in my opinion. What better way to know exactly how you, the figurehead of a HUGE country, can connect to your people, then having someone who lived outside a palace in your court?  All in all, as an American, I find British royality to be fascinating. The family, short of Charles for being an idiot, a bigot, and generally related to a tick (A bloodsucking leech, with no use), seems brilliant, and almost normal, like, the kind of person that would invite you over for a spot of tea.
As someone who is currently working an indefinite contract job, me being an asshole for a week or so would get me fired. This is one of my main issues with quitting.  *Chantix = High probability of killing myself or someone else. *Cold turkey = High probability of being fired due to general assholishness *Patches = nicotine replacement is pointless and stupid
Nope. He can't. I agree with everyone in that wedding rings are totally fine. I don't know. Man jewelry irks me. Seems just a little douchey. No offense inferior-raven.  
Robert Downey Sr.?? Mark Borchardt?? Tommy Wiseau?
Thanks for the info. I saw people mentioning ichidan and godan in the comments on the Tae Kim page but I had no idea what they were referring to.
I *always* get the two confused. It was Hitler that came up with the theory of relativity, right? 
Well at least with Diablo, there's still a slight chance you might get a copy one day.
1. Were you a first round applicant?  2. Are you considered a "traditional student"?  3. If you care to reveal the info, what was your GPA and MCAT score?  4. What was the most unexpected interview question you were asked?  5. When did you hear about your first acceptance?  Thanks, and congratulations! 
Damn they were good.
This is how bad Puritans were. They settled in Holland (who have a long history of religious tolerance) before the United States, then got kicked out ad were forced to the Americas. Even worse, the some of the more **radical ones** broke off from the ones from Massachusetts and settled in Rhode Island.  And that children, is why we can't have breasts on television in the United States.
Exactly.  Data compression pretty much cuts anything below 300 Hz and above 3kHz (3.4k seems to be the number thrown around in the specs I've tracked down--you can create tones in Praat to test it).  I know, that for me at least, the narrowed band impedes my ability to understand male voices over the cell. 
As an atheist I can tell you knowledge of the Bible will come in handy a lot more than you'd think. I've gained a lot of respect with some Christian friends because they admit that I know the Bible much better than they do. It can also embarrass them in a way that they'll want to read the Bible more and hopefully discover some of the hypocrisies that it holds. 
So...kicked by the Joker?
scruffy guy? ~~gets huffy over you~~ approaches you and asks why you are trying to knock over a tree? (fixed)  tell me, did he happen to look anything like [this?](http://blogs.mix947.com/files/2010/10/2298-lorax.jpg)
Aldi Australia is great. It's sad that people see them as "cheap" and equate that with low quality.  Their products are cheaper *and better*.
Actually, yes.
I didnt read the other replies but one way in which you can think of certain kinds of infinity is in terms of density. The set of all integers and the set of all even integers are both infinite and thus in some sense the same size. The set of all integers is just twice as dense. Sort of. 
The regret is plain to see.
The Golden Knight named Radcliffe came upon a most curious display. There was a black knight wearing a skull faceplate, an ethereal smoke coming forth from his visage.   "What is your quest, fellow knight?" questioned Sir Radcliffe, curiously.  "Hmm. I'd like a cheeseburger, if you have any." replied the mysterious knight.  "A... a what? So you don't mind if I pass?" queried Radcliffe  "Hmm. No, I've already got one, I don't need you to pass." spake the black knight  "Right..." said Radcliffe, confused " ... so I'll just be on my way then..."  And thus was the tale of zombiehippie, the Midknight Toker.
Eye-witnesses are notoriously unreliable.
That's what happened to northenlion on youtube
One of my teachers was taken away as well...I feel your pain. :( 
while I know the subreddit says Thai-POP! You can always post rock and other genres! Naming it T-pop is a good way to draw in other crowds anyways.
I got one without a hitch, as did a friend who did it at the same time. I think I beat the rush, which may account for it. It was in my spam folder.
How close is the offending FM transmitter?  If you something like 1000 feet from the tower, you probably are going to need to do some serious work, however, if you are several miles away, the task of eliminating that RFI becomes much simpler.  
I don't mind it if they aren't used as main characters 
I don't see why people would down vote this. They aren't begging for karma they aren't begging for up votes. They are fighting for their education. Fighting for what they believe in. You guys have my vote :D
Breaking a keyboard/monitor is a common karma generator found throughout Reddit. *No one actually breaks anything*.
There now.
&gt;Labor did not have a hand in this disgraceful behaviour.  lol, just because *you* say so?..fuck off stooge.
After some time, you'll get better at your job, and then maybe some of the stress of not knowing what you're doing will die down making your shift a lot more enjoyable.
I was too. I can never find any souvenirs at stores with "Ivy" on them!
the *worse* is the coming back alone, yeah. So much.
$25.00 given to the SD effort.
are these made with Pivot stickfigure animator?
Woah woah woah.  Let's not leave out New Balance. 
Because of increasingly low fluid levels and mild pre-e. Believe me, I wouldn't if I didn't have to. Come 37 weeks, I'm having a baby. 
I love when Rusty punches him in the face after he tells them he was kissing the body.
Mana leak is already to powerful in Wizards own words.  I doubt we will see any counter magic with less then 3-4 cmc ever again.
As a former resident of Allston when I was younger, I can say that this place is the biggest scam in Boston.  Total assholes.  But there are so many new college kids coming to Boston every year, that this place must make millions. Food is shit, it'll come 4 hours after you order it and the guy on the phone would shit on you if they invent the technology.
Dude everyone knows you CANT smoke 170 pots, you overdose by the 16th one. FAKE AND GAY LOLROFLCOPTERSMILEYFACEEMOTICONSMYLIFEISALIEHAHAHAHAHA
Neon Genesis Evangelion has a fantastic soundtrack and I have all three albums on my ipod. Sometimes the soundtrack is the kicker that gets me back rewatching the series.
I had a decent one before (80-340), but I found a solid 120-380 one on the AH that also had 18% mf. I need to upgrade it for my dps set, but it's great for what I need now. 
You guys like swarms of things, right?
Nice man, although I'm not too sure I would be right for a funboard having not surfed for a bit and being a pretty big dude, I can't imagine a used longboard being TOO far out of that ballpark.  Thanks!
My dad does too, but I like it well enough.
That's what Vancouver, St. Louis, and Pheonix said
I haven't played too much today, but from what I've seen I think this rumored "N7 filter" is true. Earlier I ended up in a game with three people, the lowest of which at N7 900-some. Moments ago, I ended up with two people within 20 N7 of me and an inability to find a fourth teammate.  This strikes me as a horrible, horrible idea and may honestly drive me away from the game. I don't understand how filtering matchmaking by rank, with no option on the player's end to remove that filter, effectively fragmenting the player base could be seen by anyone as a good idea. I don't care what level my teammates are, whether they are rank 5000 or rank 50; as long as they are playing and have a basic understanding of what to do, I'm fine. But apparently the game believes I should be playing with people near to my level (N7 1154 at the moment) and that doing so is more important than getting a lobby filled up in a timely manner. If I wanted to be picky about my teammates, I'd make some friends instead of playing randoms.  I really, really hope this decision gets reversed, and soon. 
You sure about the 629?  It looks a little smaller than that.  Also, I would say it's the kind that's gonna bust him right in the head if he pulls the trigger holding it like that.
[Here you go](http://i.imgur.com/RVVDa.jpg)
I don't think that is wrong either.  Say I write the next harry potter/twilight a smart populous could gather up say 250,000 dollars sell copies of the book at 1.00 each until they make 275,000 then release the book to public domain. They could then reinvest 275,000 to buy more IP sell for a dollar until they make an additional 10% then reinvest again. Do this enough and in just a few cycles you will be funding a 100 mm cgi mega movie if it is not garbage it will pay for its self plus some by opening weekend (possibly).   The problem is we need to train a generation of people who can find and who know good content, and also don't mind living off a modest wage to be buyers.
That sounds exploitable.  Are there issues with "hacks"?
Yep, I know. I was being sarcastic. Doesn't translate well to text.
Everyone deals with tragedy differently especially when they're trying to understand what happened. Neither you nor I can determine if they're actually trying to get karma points or if they're sharing something that is meaningful to them.   This incident actually reminded me of the massacre that happened on Capitol Hill a few years ago (RIP). Same type of situation, it was just so awful, and people who didn't even know those kids were affected and posting about it on Livejournal. 
Yeah the way he attacks up ramps is really good...sometimes it actually is because their not prepared. That is HuK in a nutshell, he likes to do attacks early on like all the time in every matchup, the dude would be a way better Terran player.
Jut saying what I have read. I wasn't sayin it's true for every case. 
Why did you boycott? I personally think there needs to be a wider push to boycott, but I doubt it will ever happen.
&gt; However, I do see where you're coming from with how much Quebec bashing goes on by English Canadians.  Even as an English Canadian, I didn't view it as Quebec bashing. It is known in Canada that the Quebecois accent is indeed frowned upon by Parisians (and to a lesser extent elsewhere in France).
ha!
Time to catch all the diseases 
Interview went fantastic. I'm pretty sure I got it, there's just a second screening for background check and all that jazz that I have to go through. And my background is clear, so I should be good to go.
so wait... how did the guys know it would be a female delivery driver?
As a fan. As a comic collector with thousands of dollars worth of comics, from, and including but not limited to, duplicate (sealed and reading) copies of the complete Age of Apocalypse, and Onslaught sagas, the entire Fatal Attractions (some of which are autographed by at least one of the Kuberts), House of M, and Civil War sets, to obscure sets such as all of Kirby's Captain Victory books. As the redditor who started this line of discussion in the first place, and possibly most pertinent to your premise: as the owner of a large number of "What ifs...?" and similar alternate universe one shots and tangential story arcs which demonstrate the wild abandon with which Marvel writers assign and redact massive amounts of canon, believe me when I say no, I don't know it.
Whoa wait what?! Im sorry now I have to pick up the pieces of my mind you just blew.
They dressed up like glowing coal in that one.
no problem. are you still planning on deleting your account? i have no idea the levels of creepdom you've received in PM's or whatnot, but if i were you i would just keep on keepin' on. i think the creeps/trolls find some sick satisfaction in forcing someone to delete their account.   or perhaps take the example of that 7 foot tall dude from a month or so ago, someone found his personal info and he went away for awhile and then he came back. it's up to you though.   montreat kicks ass, by the way. lotsa good memories there. i'm actually pretty positive we had a house on tennessee road. 
These are incredible. I think the end of your dummy clips tutorial is insanely badass. 
People who don't know anyone who works in movies, music or TV?
*applause*  Well done, I concede your points.
At first I was like: "Dafuq? This should be NSFW." But then I was like: "Oh. It's her knee."
"willy"
You could take it a step further and set up your PC with beer cooling.
You should dress as Pepperann!   Any other answer is wrong!:D
Is the ram paired correctly?  i.e. Some of the memory slots may be blue, some white... Depending on the MB you need to put RAM in in pairs or trios and it need to be into the slots of the same color.  Also what version of Windows (I assume 7) 32 or 64 bit?  Any non-standard hardware?  Might need to load specific drivers.
Ever been in one?  Every Piper I've ever been in (Arrow, Senica, Matrix) has felt really cheaply made; I can't say I'm a fan of them personally.  
Virginia!! I hate this place. 
For monkts its probably cheaper to go with one reistance and get the one with all perk, and then start building all resist on top of that. 
I love that movie, but the mouth cutting part of it freaked me out. My favorite part was the creepy monsters.
Roper is part of the University of Connecticut. If you want to flat out dismiss public opinion polls then that's fine. One should at least consider each opinion poll's margin of error and statistical significance before immediately dismissing it because the outcome doesn't fit one's personal agenda.  Making opinionated remarks like   &gt;that religious people on average may have a preponderance to overstate how much they donate and to where likely because their communities constantly reinforce the idea of donating  is uncalled for.   People are looking for data, and I've responded with it. I've presented a hell of a lot more than you have, and I've done so without unnecessary biased comments for or against a particular side of the issue.
Nice.
They're ALL Totino's pizzas (and ALL classic pepperoni). I saved all the boxes for half a year. Four 5' columns later, had to throw 'em all away cuz I was moving.
I work at Wal-mart lol, unless you're correcting the brandname for me, Equate and Great Value are both in-house brands.  Although Equate tends to be in the HBA section (shampoo etc) :P
now I want all of these for my tf2, thanks for sharing.
stay free, canada
This smells so much like a hoax.
best dead space player ever!
I've tried the same. It's tricky and I never figured it out myself.
Ok thanks for your opinion and your reply
yeah it happened to me too. it almost always occurred when I was playing music through the speakers and then would immediately go away when I plugged headphones in. since I could repeat the issue easily, I took it back to the AT&amp;T store and got it swapped for another one. so far, no issues with my new one.
Maybe she couldn't walk for a reason other than being heavy.  Just because she has two legs doesn't mean they work.
I'd subscribe to it. 
A lot (most?) tracks have DJ-friendly intros and outros in their original mix versions which, while not the best part of the track, is pretty listenable. But the "intro" in this track is pretty awful.  The track itself is meh too, not something worth the number of upvotes it has. But that's another story.
Malt o Meal cereals have come up quite a bit in price lately, and they don't seem to be the killer deal they used to be. 
Dude couldn't agree more.  I went through 2 Razor mice before finally giving up frustrated with their support and cables fraying.  Bought a Logitech gaming mouse and 3 years later I'm still rocking it. OH and check out the solar powered keyboard. I've had it for 6 months in low light with no issues.
Yea, got it at publix
well I used to crush newpz so I'd prolly get down with that. 
And here I thought the constant was Gravity.  Newton, Einstein, you guys are dumb.
Mountain Holler is the shit.
I don't know but I expected this cheese-ball type of narrative from this game. We've been getting them since the early Resident Evils (from capcom) so I wasn't too bothered with the narrative at all. I'd rather have a game not take itself so seriously unless it is really spectacular.
His mind went years ago.
It may be a bit cheap, but what I'd do is get my anti-material rifle, find a spot where they couldn't reach me, then sniped them.
Yup. But thats sort of the point. The fact that you are technically an adult when you are 18 doesn't mean you fully comprehend the impact of decisions on your life.   The problem with student loans as they can quickly become life-altering. It is one thing to ring up 2 grand you don't have on a credit card and learn your lesson at 19. You pay it off over a year or two even on a low wage and live basically how you would've before.  It is another to make one or two mistakes and have it ruin your life.
When I was a child myself, I was under the impression giving birth was just something all females would inevitably do. The thought terrified me. The idea and impending doom of giving birth through my vag and the pain that was taught to be associated with it was almost as horrific to me as the idea of death. When I reached the age where I realized I actually had a choice, it was like a weight lifted off my shoulders. 
Practice. It's not cheating if you don't get caught. It's smart test taking skills. 
shooting like a jackass?
I passed out shortly after posting this haha
Wait, Notch is a fan of MLP? When did this happen?
Thanks! tryin
Holy shit. Who is that?
Thanks and maybe so ;)
Did you actually look at the picture? He is comparing a gamestop pre-owned game to a "good" condition one online.
If she can work, she should be able to get a copy of her own birth certificate.
So what is the time/Date for this thing?
I didn't include all the stuff I got, but it's basically interchangeable. These were the wardrobes I could make with it. Everything you see was bought new except the Uniqlo pants that went with the white cotton jacket.  The third picture also looks a little baggy but that was because I didn't tuck it in all the way.
He was somehow caught a glimpse of a glitch that would destroy the world. [He woke up before the plane crash and survived because he was somewhere else.] However, he was suppose to die by the plane crash. So the movie was about him realizing that he wasn't meant to survive that plane crash and in the end, he stayed in the bed and died. 
This video needs more upvotes.
LazerQuest.  Fucking laser tag marshall.  I'm the only girl that works there.
Woooo! Great job!
Thanks for all the good fights. I hope he gets all the legal stuff handled. Maybe turn into a bad ass coach and start cranking out some future stars?!
I agree, but it would suck for the rivalry to end just as IU is becoming relevant again.
&gt;Assuming that I hold the views of the original text. http://existentialnihilist.wordpress.com/    Perhaps I should have made it more clear that I meant the images on the front page of /atheism, rather than /antitheism.  Right and Wrong in no way relates to happy and sad, if that was in fact what you were saying.  What exactly about the nonexistence of altruism in human relations is skewed? Of course humanity is a mixture of prosocial and antisocial behavior, rather than either extreme.
Pretty much. Walking in to my living room to find Emilia Clarke is the perfect way to end any night.
Wehn.
I suppose across the pond your north may be different from our north. The activities you describe could easily take place in a quite of few states over here.
The Lannister Armor.
At least you didn't have to be on the side kopitar scored on. I'm assuming this was taken in the first period.
Hey luddy!
I would probably pay you money for that.
What's goin' on mom mom?
The way conservative judaism is makes a lot of sense if you consider its past. Positive-historical Judaism gave rise to conservative, and it held that tradition and law shouldn't be changed, not that they couldn't be. That's essentially what conservative Judaism does, regardless of what their ideology is "on the books".
Augustus from the book The Fault In Our Stars
The most interesting part of this article is that is states that while Carrick may be interested in returning, he has an Achilles injury of his own at the moment.  What's going on guys, get it together! I hope Paul Ince or David Batty still have their boots, cos they are getting scarily close to the top of the call-up list.
Thank you titanicx, I will keep that in mind.
wow, very to the point... could I have some advice??? idk... lol, the map is already done and turned in XD
&gt; Its the most exciting development in the history of **the science**.  That sounds ridiculous 
Thanks, the calendar is from Grassroots Motorsports and my computer wallpaper is from the Tour of Flanders.
And for those (not) playing along: http://www.heraldextra.com/news/local/crews-battle-a-second-fire-on-west-side-of-utah/article_141aa7c6-ab7a-11e1-b0fe-0019bb2963f4.html  http://fox13now.com/2012/05/31/crews-fighting-fire-west-of-utah-lake/
that is her
redditors are allergic to tact. 
I would be proud to be considered such by anyone on r/ainbow or r/lgbt, and especially by you.
the shirt is a light pink, the tie has light pink lines through it and the suit is a very subtle pinstripe
On the same token though, degree navigator isn't always correct. Make sure to double check everything on there with your transcript and the department websites.
Not weird, you're being unnecessarily jealous, which is a huge turn off btw
I've been looking for the first three and a good deal forEVER. Thank you and a million upvotes to you Nostril! &lt;3 
http://i0.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/000/181/367/closeenough.png?1317606898
Thanks!
HOT DOG JOHNNYS FTW! I live maybe half an hour from there! Used to get water from the old spring on 46 that has since been removed, then my grandparents would take us to Hot Dog Johnny's for lunch. ah, memories...
I agree! You pay so much just to be in the incrowd! U guess we all are hipsters...
Nice story, but it doesn't require being an ent to appreciate your last day of school.
We're not like a gang or anything.
ask around on SRK boards, or search for ticket selling threads. I'm sure you can find something, if you are in the area you could always hope to scalp some tickets.
Not a bad idea
You said coming *snickers*
Umm no? #yolo
i'm not expert on mining details with the GPU and the interfaces but I'm pretty sure the main mining software that exists wants to use a OpenCL interface to the GPU, and only certain newerish ATI and NVIDIA cards have that. Whats the GPU in the family computer vs your own computer?
Needs to end with. "OHOHOHOHO!"
&gt; This will not happen without strictly enforcing harsh impediments on the personal freedom of individuals.   I don't know whether the consequences are actually as bad as we would think. Have a look at the variation between [various developed nations](http://www.google.com/publicdata/explore?ds=d5bncppjof8f9_&amp;ctype=l&amp;strail=false&amp;bcs=d&amp;nselm=h&amp;met_y=en_atm_co2e_pc&amp;scale_y=lin&amp;ind_y=false&amp;rdim=region&amp;idim=country:DEU:GBR:FRA:USA:CAN:SWE&amp;ifdim=region&amp;tdim=true&amp;tstart=-302490000000&amp;tend=1306882800000&amp;ind=false). Very cold, quite disperse Sweden has a third of the emissions of very cold, quite disperse Canada.
I always felt average but yes all the equipment I've seen in real life is smaller then mine
I've fed my dog pig femurs before--they're very edible!  :]  Mmmm pig femur.  
Then I'm here just in time!!
Me thinking I was emo as fuck at 15. Just got my lip pierced in my room, and that is a razorblade-shaped pendant I have on. http://imgur.com/AxEL5
From what comic?  I made this with my own computer, so this repost crap is getting on my nerves!
i dont know, i feel like the dog from Up! could make this very enjoyable.
Guys, have we already forgotten how good Bos used to be before his injury? Yes he made defensive errors but he had the speed and stamina to make up for them and bomb down the flank all game long. Personally, I would prefer Brana all season at RB with Todd Kane cover. Especially since we have a potent attacking 5.  However, we do need another first team RB and if we can get VDW for £8m it will be some tidy business for a promising young player.
Pretty much. It seems like the investment people have in this particular freebe is a weeee bit excessive.   Like, unbelievably excessive. 
Well now I have to tag you as that.
Their most popular songs are definitely not their best works.
What's WOTL?
Your idiocy is funny to me. :D
haha nostalgic about something you're currently eating
no problem :)
This to the ^n th degree.   Cat chewed gaming headset cord. Sent pics to logitech. Send upgraded replacement headset.  I didn't specifically mention the cat.  On a side note, my mx510 has been running strong for 8 years? Maybe more?
I just let out a hardy HA for you. Make up for it?
Shift click sort of works but it does them serially rather than in parallel
on most maps you can hold it off with good ol placement (made easier with latest patch) and cancelling your expo.  the 75 minerals you burn from the cancel is nothing compared to the loss he took
I did get the book. And it has been sitting on my shelf. I spent 45 minutes reading it without a computer around and it seems very well written for absolute beginners. It starts at zero, so it was a little below my level. I am planing on using it some more. The design of the book is made for great usability and visual appearance. I can honestly recommend it.  
Grew up with Sasktel, always was plagued with problems. Constantly, just constantly. Now in my own house I'm paying 23 dollars a month for 20 Mbps down and 2.5 Mbps up, regularly download torrents at &gt;1 Mbps
That must have really rustled your Jimmy.  I'll see myself out.
Big K.R.I.T. - Down Out
Old but good, I laugh errtime.
TIL your girlfriend is a man, man. 
Kitchen? I'd opt for a room with fewer knifes.
I do, actually.
You're new here, aren't you?
at least it wasn't a sad sad sad 150.00 I believe for a lifetime subscription!
There is quite a bit of oil left, and insane amounts of coal.   High oil prices helps renewables, as this type of energy become increasingly competitive.   Unfortunately, the same thing goes for coal. If we burn even a quarter of the coal left in the ground within a century, we're fucked, simple as that.   Fun bonus coal fact 1)  Coal saved the forests. If we hadn't started burning coal, we would have continued burning trees, and you would very rarely have seen one today. And there would be no industrial revolution.   Fun bonus coal fact 2)  Burning coal releases far, far more radioactivity into the environment than nuclear power.   So let us thank coal for all it has done for us, and then STOP USING IT ASAP.
dunno about the US, but over in france they have "[heavy legs](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Heavy_legs)".
Same here. Was a constant problem pre-keto, but like my heartburn and reflux, is completely gone.
I wish I was just completely dead.
For real...
Once you get a C- in your first class the effect sort of wears off haha...
Is it weird that I came here to see what the appendix actully use to be for?
lol.  there have been many threads on many forums about this.. not one has been stopped because of it AFAIK
 [](/rdsad) As someone who isn't even much of an apple fan, I was saddened by this. 
As an NBA fan i like it. keep them coming.
badum tssh!
Mind if I piggyback this comment? andrewsmith1986, you are utterly and completely pathetic. I hope you know how many people hate you.
If you want loyalty, get yourself a dog. Don't ever expect loyalty from a fellow human being. They will always serve their own self interest. This is a life lesson you've just learned but at 22 you're young enough to recover and start over, older and wiser.
I'm a freelance image improver. My unemployment makes other people look good by comparison.
dude that looks sketch......You are going to go to mars to live in a trailer park.
That's probably why mine doesn't have the park light option actually, if I turn the ignition on, all the lights will turn on except the headlights. The headlights turn on once the motor is running, although I have HIDs and I don't remember if the halogens turned on when I turned the ignition on, it's been a long time.
Somebody makin' soup?
That screen shot tells me nothing. It's a  sentence from someone I do not know. It tells me nothing.
I've not seen the BBC programme, so I've not seen the footage but I though I would comment on your Arsenal part of your comment. Also I'm not sticking up for the Arsenal chanting. Any fan singing anti-semitic chants are scum. 
'Stoner that for some reason is intelligent"
Gas $50 leaves you with $25. If you needed money so much you'd steal it, it would imply you have $0. So how are you going to buy a phone and a necklace. Also the girls clearly just had hair product out in hence now regrowth so where did that money come from? Or for the Starbucks drinks? I know they didn't steal it if they're that shit at it. 
You're young, peer pressure is going to effect you right now more than at any time in your future.  You're still building an identity.  Saying no is a matter of self respect, you'll get there.  For now, try to realize that you hold all the cards, men at your age are pushy about sex because sex is a scarce commodity for guys in your age bracket.  The opposite is true for you, as much as it may not seem like it, you can be much MUCH more choosy about the caliber of guy you get intimate with. Pro-tip, guys who just shove their hands down your pants are disgusting, and not worth your time.  Second, if a relationship leads with sex, don't be surprised if it ends there too.  If you are looking for more than that, lead with more than that.  If a guys bolts when you don't put out, he was going to bolt afterwards anyway.  The best sex is had between two people who mutually respect each other, and like each others company regardless.  Tell anyone who pushed you to fuck off. It took me 13 years from where you're at to learn this stuff and start practicing, start now and you'll be way ahead.
That my friend is a very good observation! I wonder if we're ever going to learn more about Tenzin's brother/sister...
Not many people can afford multiple vehicles, so if you need a truck it also has to serve as a daily driver. This means the majority of time its acting as any other basic form of transportation.  If you don't automatically assume truck drivers are dumb rednecks, and think for a minute about why they own the vehicle this should be obvious. Of course this involves questioning your initial opinion, unfortunately not many people are capable of this.
what kind of things do you like? history, nature, epic statues, castles, temples?
I never know what to tell people I do when they ask.  I design a lot of large-scale electronic systems.  It's really part power, part communications.  
Yeah, for sure. Those casts are pretty damned big. May your friend's pup recover swiftly! :)
I don't think there are Gods at all.  You can take all the religions and boil them down to this: the ASOIAF universe runs on magic, and all magic requires sacrifice.  It's the one thing that every religion has in common: you need to sacrifice something in order to get results.
You. Can. What?! That would be out of this world.   Is there anything from Australia you would like in return?
As a student of Pitt, I think this is hilarious. This is common knowledge on campus. I guess student affairs does their job well.
Well it was just an example (and he's not really that spectacular a DM anywho).  Maybe I'm just not used to hearing it so it sounds silly.
That's why you don't seek the refund from them, but from the CC company. 
I love salary salt.
I've been on depo for over a year, and honestly I love it. So it really does depend on the person. I only gained about five pounds, which were incredibly easy to get rid of. I cut out soda, bam they were gone.   I was on medication that interfered with almost all BC except Depo, so it's quite lucky that it worked out well for me.
And this is precisely why I talked to my (now ex, for other reasons) gf and made sure we were in agreement that we weren't having unplanned kids, and that she'd get an abortion if needed.
I'm a big fan of woodsball to be honest. I'd really like a gun to pick off someone at a good distance.
Kaalia gets weaker somewhat the more players there are at the table. She's typically turned into someone's beatstick and the person who can answer her usually sits on that answer until Kaalia's gone and eliminated everyone else. (I know because I've manipulated a Kaalia player into shutting down a Kamahl player and killing off another player, only to finish the Kaalia player off myself once the other two were completely out of the picture.)  Kaalia's strategy is very aggro heavy and it doesn't really always jive with the diplomatic nature of edh. (Or rather, it does, but it requires a lot more thinking and talking than other decks)  Stigles is right though.. you can win edh without ever bothering to build a great deck.. just a playable one. I know a guy who just threw his box of black commons together with some swamps and he's won before. It all depends on how you can focus the hate of the table around and take advantage of weaknesses.
Yeah, mine payed me overtime for the that... But I don't think it was worth it.  :(
I'll say it again, DERPY BASTARDS!
http://imgur.com/ysyOS  Our product at work. Funny thing is, I'm pretty kind-hearted, but I work in an office building and don't ever deal with the consumer, just distributors. As such - sending out 10,000+ units a day doesn't particularly phase me until I think about just how much impact I have on so many lives. However, this business has truly focused my moral compass in ways I never expected.
&gt;You beg the question: WHY was Al Qaeda threatening the US, when they used to be our allies against the Soviets?  Because American interests and al-Qaida's interests ran against each other.
Liveleak screams FOUL on this, and im inclined to agree, without repeating too many of the comments , they basically landed on a balcony right under which they do show early in the video, another case in point is that a quadruple suicide in Hawaii would really have made big news , especially if it was filmed ..
Did the nanny ever get in trouble? Did she have other documented cases of such acts? What did your parents do when they found out? How did little our survive for a whole few days on your own? Do you plan on writing a memoir? You should do an AMA. Even if it's just for me. I am thoroughly interested in your life story. 
Dick
I'd check out T-Mobile's no contract plans. They are probably the best value. 
That's a nice spoon. If I were you, I would have spent more on a graduation present for myself, gotten an epic bong or something because I would now have a place to hit one and would no longer be in a dorm. Props though.
Yeah, I know.  Subway is the prime example and I love Subway.  For some reasoin buying pb&amp;j seems like wasting money.  When you buy a sandwich at subway it seems like you get more on it if you want.  PB&amp;J bought at the store is just pb&amp;j, nothing added to it.
Recently found MFA... took some recommendations on common goods mentioned here and ordered.  LEC heritage OCBD in blue and white, medium. http://imgur.com/a/dkuAB Way too big in medium... just look at that neck. These are going back for small's. I hope they fit!  Jcrew "neck &amp; sleeve dess shirts" (slim 120's, 2ply), 15/34  http://imgur.com/a/d9awC So soft. Feels high quality. A tad tight in the shoulders. I'm not sure it's all that noticeable. I really like the [end-on-end blue](http://www.jcrew.com/mens_category/shirts/dressshirts/PRDOVR~35749/35749.jsp) I ordered. Keeping these, don't even think they need tailoring!
The Simpsons did it!
Create this as Original Post so others can see its awesomeness?
I would love to slip and slide right on in there.
Why are most of these cannibals black? Are wanna-be zombies usually black?
Can you clarify on what you don't like about Sibelius 7? I'm currently running Sibelius 5 and I was thinking about upgrading, but I don't want to spend the money if it isn't going to be worth it.
Yea you can
Are you me? My parents opened up their own restaurant and now I'm employed under them for free. On one hand, I get to eat whatever I want whenever I want, I get to fuck around on the computer if it's a slow day, I get along really well with customers, and it's definitely improved my relationship with my parents (although things can get intense sometimes).  What keeps you motivated, though? I love being able to do something, saying that I have a job I really dedicate my time to, but sometimes I just get sick of being there so often. Restless, you know?
"a naked attempt to bury bad news” - but what was the bad news again?  What are the options?  1) The PM's former communications chief, who has close ties to the Murdoch's, facing perjury allegations.   2) The PM's current communications chief telling the BBC's Norman Smith what he should be reporting whilst Boris Johnson calls the BBC "biased to the Left".  3) The culture secretary's enthusiastic private communications with Murdoch after being assigned authority over the BSkyB bid and after the Telegraph exposed Vince Cables Murdoch outburst.  4) A budget U-turn about charity tax proposals that was probably inserted into the budget purely to be used as a distraction later on (talk about misuse of position).
Little immature of her... I, a 22 year old, dated a 28 year old for a couple months. People need to get over the taboo of age. Hang in there bro diddley
What I hate even more is when you go to a site in safari, and it loads the PC version for a split second, giving you a glimpse of what you came for, before redirecting you to their main mobile homepage, completely disregarding what you were looking at before, and block the ability to go back. I don't care what was on that page anymore, fuck you and your shitty website. 
I havr no idea what the hell this is, or why they celebrate it....but this is fucking beautiful.
I actually wrote [an article](http://prancinglaggard.com/2012/05/28/a-pizelated-symphony-why-game-music-matters/) pertaining to this just a few days ago
I had a roommate who was one of those girls who got to college and into a relationship within a month. Shortly after they started dating, they were in the room with me and I heard her say "If I dumped you I could have a new boyfriend within a month." Did not know people this full of it ACTUALLY existed!
why are people upvoting this. he is just another retard ruining the game
that's a fuckin awesome piece, man
Surely OP will deliver. 
This is misleading.  Most children spend most of their time with family members. Thus, most abusers are family members, simply because they have the most opportunity. 
Some assholes use their belief in God to justify making every conversation about how much more right about everything they are than you. Some assholes use their atheism to justify making every conversation about how much more right about everything they are than you. It's pretty damn obnoxious.  Ran into a blog this morning that was 99% about why the blogger is an atheist and how bigoted Christians are, how the FSM is the only God, all the worst interpretations of every ugly Bible quote... except the most recent post was an editorial about how "if you're born a man you're a man no matter how much surgery you get!" in which was repeated absolutely every cliched trans-hate trope in existence. I'm sure tomorrow it'll be back to how open-minded he is because he's an atheist and how appalling it is that Christians think their subjective moral beliefs should be forced on the rest of the world.
I think there are HUGE SWATHS of common ground between most conservatives and most liberals. I just wish our representatives could embrace this fact. I'm inclined to say that most of the stonewalling is on the GOP side, but I think GOP doesn't necessarily mean conservative anymore.
Well to be fair this is City Government doing this, and Federal Government is what's providing the subsidies. Totally different beasts. But I agree.
Well, I'm hard.  What's next?
http://imgur.com/ai1Ca
haha me too. but i have done many things you wonder.
May 31st code: b7c31c40c53a0d6fd81b
[](/x10) Somad
You became at an atheist at 25? I don't know how long or how recently that was, but do you feel you have stronger conviction of atheism by living longer and experiencing more, along with research than say, someone who was always atheist, or became one at a younger age due to just picking it up?  Do you wish you became an atheist sooner?
I hope you are seriously planning where she will be living. This doesn't sound good at all. 
Will you be lounging around or swimming (pool or ocean?).   I don't really suggest purchasing a top that won't fit you correctly... but if you insist...  If you're actively swimming in the ocean, I might go for a 32C, because a tight band is really important to battle the waves. If you're lounging, I'd go for a 34C, because it is technically a ... *sigh*.... "sister size" (Add one size to your band/cup and subtract it from the other). They don't tend to fit well, because they aren't your size, but they're sort of equivalent (if, say, your bras are a bit tight you may have a 33" rib cage, putting you between sizes.  Any time you buy a top that's not your size, however, you will find that it won't fit as well and you may end up returning it or hating it. The best choice would be to find a bathing suit elsewhere. (Have you looked into Bravvisimo/Pepperberry? www.bravissimo.com/products/swimwear/bikinis/ - it's a UK site, but it has a flat $10 S&amp;H fee and will carry 32D).
Yea Fenix, keep em' coming.  Same as below, its been great seeing you progress and learn as a player, from noob to seasoned vet.. I'm still in awe of the fact you get into places that are usually war zones.. I haven't watched this new installment yet BTW!
Cool picture, but your text makes no sense.
It depends. It matters to some people, doesn't to others... I'm dating a girl who's just under 5'.
I'd say you're a butter face. I don't know how you can improve on that. Maybe focus on personality.
Skin cancer wouldn't be the cause of the pressure of _losing_ melanin. I would imagine a vitamin D deficiency would probably be a much stronger pressure for less melanin than skin cancer would be for more melanin.
Yes, as opium did not come in liquid form.  They did use acid back then.
What? I thought Civic's are full size sedans? I can't imagine driving something much smaller than my Fiesta it's freaking tiny! So much more fun to drive then my old Lincoln Town Car.
I find it hard to believe that The Hound is simply upset by seeing the Lannisters bullying someone. He's been with them his whole life. Surely he's seen stuff just as bad, if not worse, than what he has seen with respect to Sansa. Yet, for some reason, he finds himself drawn to her in a way that he has never shown towards anyone else (that we know of).  There's something specific about her case that has hit him in a way that he hasn't been hit before.
Reddit is worse than tween girls for gushing about celebs, just different celebs. It's like if in the next issue of some glossy magazine,  "Gaben's summer body" "Joseph Gordon Levtit's favorite food" "Zach Braff tweets" "Mathew Lillard's comeback" "Nick Cage Nick Cages" "Emma Watson shares her top sex tips" "Neil Degrass Tyson's dirty weekend" 
yes yes testff
Honestly, I care no more or less what the color of someone's hair is than I care about the color of their skin, their country of origin, their religion, or their sexual orientation. Until and unless I get to know someone, it just fucking doesn't matter to me, and I can't figure out why it should be any of my damn business.  That being said, I married a redhead.
reminds me of why i stopped watching the videos. He picks the ONE class without a weapon attack and then whines that he gets no weapon attack, suggests that multiplayer leads to other people taking your loot (not the case), and generally whines about tons of stuff that just isnt in the game.  Yahtzee is the Fox News of video game reviews. 
So you're saying he kept the sin a secret, not the relationship? But we just established that the relationship was not sinful...  I hear what you're saying about the pasuk, but I've never heard this, and don't really understand it. But I'll take your word for it, for now.
Exactly! 
[Dun Dun Duuuuuuuuuuuuuuh](http://www.dramabutton.com/)
What laptop is that?
thats just called being sexy.
What do they do for sex?
Your schedule is good. Its better to have the afternoon free and have cram your classes because if you're like most people, you wont do anything during your breaks.
Widely used. I swear Barca players are the most pretentious people you will meet.  http://www.dailymail.co.uk/sport/football/article-2134935/Cesc-Fabregas-Barcelona-deserved-win-I-wish-Chelsea-best-final.html  http://www.espnstar.com/football/news/detail/item775951/  http://www.goal.com/en/news/1716/champions-league/2012/03/29/2998705/barcelonas-xavi-we-deserved-to-win-against-ac-milan
You've inspired me to sign up. The process scares the hell out of me, but it can't be as bad as the diseases I'd be helping to treat.
That was awesome to read. Thank you for posting it 
OP can't read
Did you hear him guys? This is gonna be bigger than *Big Brother!* Boy, Jeff Probst is gonna be pissed when he hears about this!
For professional audio you will probably want to start with the Zoom H4n, and then buy a boom pole and mic to go with it. If you are just looking for better camera-mounted audio, then the Rode Videomic Pro is a good bet
Last time I did on OKcupid I got a lot of poor comments, other sites however are much more positive. 
The army does paintball training to simulate real life situations at complexes like this
Well dang it, I just exchanged a game for just cause 2 didn't know it was that cheap...
This is LoL's 99th champion
Yeah I honestly like too young more than too old
elbucho
No, it can have arcane, frost, mortar, missile dampening, vortex, horde, etc.  The most common seems to be some form of mortar+molten.  Molten should never really damage you so long as you don't kite yourself out of space and die to their martyr bombs.  My fully-buffed stats in MF are only 16k life/61%dr/141resist all/25k dmg. A newly minted lvl60 that wisely buys up a bunch of solid 50k items should have way more life and at least as much of every other stat.
I starts in fif and I ends in fif.
Does Red Sox Nation look like a bitch to you, Beckett? Well, do they?!
Here's what the C1 looks like after it's been cleaned up a little: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=H3u0IIQj6FY#t=597s
Up vote for effort and awesomeness
Is this overdone yet?  http://imgur.com/uciQC
They have a comment section, just not for the english articles.
If Victarion doesn't have six yet, he will come TWOW.   Because Victarion.
Blue menu pancake mix is horrible. Regular PC pancake mix (in the red and white box) is fucking amazing. Its soooooo fluffy and magical. You just add water! Aunt Jemima can suck the President's dick. 
Or trip before it and then get impaled horribly when you land on it.
Holy Shit-snacks! Nice job!
There is no husky, only zuuuuul!
&gt;regardless of the trashy community of players  Elaborate?
Does Photobucket just not work for anyone else? I hate that site.
[http://www.reddit.com/r/explainlikeimfive/comments/udb84/eli5_how_could_the_us_intervene_so_quickly_in/c4ulf8r](http://www.reddit.com/r/explainlikeimfive/comments/udb84/eli5_how_could_the_us_intervene_so_quickly_in/c4ulf8r)
I did not have any followers at the time.
My lady and I were both pretty drunk.   3 min in I was like "almost there".   Like 20 min later (we'd been drinking whiskey...i'm no stallion) she's out of breath and cramping up. She says "Fuck, babe, I thought you said you were almost done" to which I reply "DUFFMAN SAYS A LOT OF THINGS. OHHHH YEAH." in full-on Duffman voice.   Its my proudest moment, really.
Reminds me of this [guy](http://keithboadwee.com/artwork/645131_Purple_Squirt.html)
Agreed
No matter what anyone say, iNcontroL is the shit
What kind of faggot guests get "overwhelmed" by bleach fumes? Lol
I seldom laugh out loud, but that link did it.
If so, it is a trade! =D I cannot wait to finish this deck.
not sure what "misrable" is, but if it's anything like miserable, you're right.  how silly of me to have a meaningful inscription as opposed to a flamboyantly colored koi fish or an incredibly original skull...
Uh, what golden age are you referring to? And giant corporations were more powerful back during the Gilded Age. Look into JP Morgan, shit was crazy. 
Aang was definitely dying.  He was just shot in the spine with lightning. He was in a coma for two weeks, even with magic water!
Go on, I'm really excited for your next imaginative and not-at-all boring insults. Maybe call me a cunt or a bitch, you might possibly want to talk about how I need a good dicking since my uterus is floating around my body, since women and hysteria, rite? I mean, it's not like your material is literally centuries old.
I have never personally worked out in the gym at RVCC but it looked decent enough and not too crowded.  A lot of the machines will have diagrams of how to use them.  Check out r/fitness for workouts and such.  
Then I suggest you contact the World Trade Center Association and tell them that you're disgusted with them for continuing to build trade relations across 98 countries. Tell them that because one of their locations was destroyed, they should rename their other 316 locations to something else.  Make sure you send an angry letter to the World Trade Center Albany, World Trade Center Anchorage, World Trade Center Atlanta, World Trade Center Baltimore, World Trade Center Boston, World Trade Center Buffalo, World Trade Center Cleveland, World Trade Center Dallas, World Trade Center Denver, World Trade Center Detroit, World Trade Center Fort Lauderdale, World Trade Center Harrisburg, World Trade Center Harrison, World Trade Center Honolulu, World Trade Center Houston, World Trade Center Jackson, World Trade Center Kansas City, World Trade Center Kingsport, World Trade Center Las Vegas, World Trade Center Lexington, World Trade Center Long Beach, World Trade Center Los Angeles, World Trade Center McAllen, World Trade Center Memphis, World Trade Center Miami, World Trade Center Milkwaukee, World Trade Center Missoula, World Trade Center New Orleans, World Trade Center Newark, World Trade Center Norfolk, World Trade Center Orlando, World Trade Center Oxnard, World Trade Center Palm Beach, World Trade Center Philadelphia, World Trade Center Pittsburgh, World Trade Center Portland, World Trade Center Providence, World Trade Center Richmond, World Trade Center Rogers, World Trade Center Sacramento, World Trade Center San Antonio, World Trade Center San Diego, World Trade Center Sanannah, World Trade Center Seattle, World Trade Center St. Louis, World Trade Center St. Paul, World Trade Center Tacoma, World Trade Center Tampa, World Trade Center Washington DC, World Trade Center Wichita, and World Trade Center Wilmington.  And that's just in the United States. You've got 97 more countries to go. Good luck fighting that crusade of yours.
obese sultan rapist http://soundcloud.com/voiceimpersonator/obese-sultan-rapist
I thought we'd discovered the purpose of the appendix? Isn't it like the OS recovery partition of the digestive system?
Yes. 1950 on the SAT and that paragraph reads like it was written by a fifth grader. Principle instead of Principal...to instead of too...  I'd say you'll actually study this time.
Nobody, you didn't get these in kids meals...
You can pretty much say the same thing about any subject matter in r/Christianity though. I think it's quite unfair to target this specific subject matter as something that should be avoided just because some people are bored of it.   It seems easier to just avoid the posts you think are 'overdone' rather than tell people that they should keep quiet about something they care about.  
dont like that band, but that shirt is really cool!
I have the entire Avatar On DVD, and as soon as LOK comes out ill do the same, but the ones on nick dont look to good :/ I plan on buying part one of the promise this weekend 
Here in Amarillo, Texas the entire city closes down every sunday. The only thing open is fast food restaurants. I hang out in a McDonalds all day just to have something to do.
Nothing like marrying them though.
Port Discovery? 
I understand, but it's also a absolutely dumb argument from hirez that "it isn't how we intended it". I agree it's rare that it ends up *defining* the game, but bugs and unintended consequences have constantly enhanced gameplay at the highest level over different games.  Was bunnyhopping intended in CS? Was mutastacking/chinese triangle/lurker hold intended in Starcraft? Hell, I even think creep stacking wasn't intended in DotA (someone correct me if I'm wrong). Even funny stuff in DotA like Chen teleport/Pudge Hook has been left in by IceFrog. All those elements have enhanced their respective games and they are all undisputedly the kings of eSports.
Well im doing economics at degree level and its incorporated. Integration by parts etc
we're gonna figure out who this hair-mano guy is and give him what he deserves
I am ashamed...
Thats my birthday!
What happened next?  Did they recover the data in time?  You can't end on a cliffhanger like that!
How do I get to the secret menu? Do I enter the Konami code or something?
Some kid threw a rock at my head. got a funny feeling and tilted my head to the side. It missed, perfectly. They were SO impressed that they continued throwing rocks at my head.
But you must, you must! :)
Correct. Here in the US, all egg products are USDA required to be Pasteurized. [Source.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pasteurized_eggs) whereas shell eggs must be temperature controlled-but not necessarily pasteurized.  Not the case in Europe though.  edit: You can get shell-pasteurized eggs in most mega-marts if food-born illness is a concern. Here's an egg-cellent [article.](http://sambygrave.tumblr.com/post/4251336397/understanding-eggs-in-drinks)
Technically speaking, Amp-Hours is a measurement of electrical charge.
You found an advertisement? Wow. Groundbreaking. 
A simple one...a couple breaking up.
R3 1992 Alfa Romeo 155 Q4  I actually tuned it! This is what happens when I tune things, witness the beauty...
Cartwheel! Fist pump! Football style touchdown dance! High five everyone! 
Unfortunately, a deck has to have at least 60 cards.
Nope ;)
No sir.  I don't like it.  (Ren &amp; Stimpy)  You shower in that tub and you'll soak most of the floor.  The mirror is pointed at the toilet - a really bad place.  I like the walls.  I like the mirror.  Relocate the mirror, give me a much larger sink (WITH a mirror over it - I shave my face), and install a tub/shower that I can use.  Then you've got a proper room.
Basically it's a challenging sales job in which it boils down to whether you can make things happen.  If you have confidence that you can sell, go for it.
The complete disregard for being politicaly correct just made my day. Thanks man, I mean it.
Brown Tripoli is really good for taking off grime, and built up finger oils, that have hardened on pipes that have sat for a long time, or other finish contaminates. It work exceptionally well on estate Pipes that have acquired that aged darkened, patina from disuse or long storage. It helps soften abrasions from a pipes finish if they have been scratched, dropped, dented or otherwise damaged in some way, and it helps bring luster back to a dulled finish just like a rubbing compound does for a car finish when being detailed. It also helps on rusticated pipes if you've gotten some kind of foreign substances lodged or etched into the rustication pattern. I've been smoking a pipe since I was 18 and I am 46 now, and it's always worked for me in the past. As with any process, you can use the steps you feel you need, and drop the steps you feel are not needed. I recommended my Process, you recommended yours. Neither is irresponsible, just different. 
Civilisation V, Rise of Nations... I hear Tropico is alright, too, although a bit more... comedically dictatorial.
I'm going to PI. Good luck and enjoy your freedom while you can.
Mmm Dat ankle. 
for Eclipse, which do i get?
That looks like a really good one. [This is the one some of the guys on the fire department have](http://search.barnesandnoble.com/EMS-Field-Guide-Jon-Tardiff/e/9781890495305?r=1&amp;cm_mmc=GooglePLA-_-UsedTextbook-_-Q000000633-_-9781890495305&amp;cm_mmca2=pla) however it isn't as thorough of a hand book that the one you provided probably is.
Think about why you are attached to it. Also, why do you say it's a waste if you get rid of it? It's never going to be used again, hopefully, if that's what you want. It's like throwing old clothes that don't fit you any more.
I've also said stuff like "Gold chest" or "TreasureGoblin on me" only to have no one show up while I wait. I have the goblin one on my macro so that I don't have to waste time.  The running to the other side of the map solo is also something I do. I build to make myself fast, then I can run the other way and look for the exit while you guys go off and look also. Feels bad when you die but hey, sometimes I just dont want to spend 10minutes in a cave and find out it was the first turn. 
Muslims don't like abortions.
The owner of the Bagelry has a hard time keeping good servers, and fires perfectly great ones. Blame him for the service.  Woods Coffee can suck it. Thanks for planting another bigoted chain coffee shop RIGHT smack in front of one of the best local coffee places in Bellingham: The Black Drop. Also, their coffee really is not great tasting.
No, no you are not. My friends always try to take me there, but as a native New Mexican, I just cant stand that place.
So in the first instance, I'm a heterosexual, but in the second instance, I'm a homosexual, even though it's the same person? At what point does the hetero person become gay? After one homosexual encounter? Because that contradicts what you said previously.   The point I'm trying to make is that defining sexuality is incredibly difficult and usually misguided. It's better to think of it on a continuum which is adjusted continuously over time.
If you want real wtf go to r/morbidreality or something and quit complaining.
Geisha! Please do!
In reply to his reference you are wrong. In reply to just the picture you are right. I replied to the reply on the reference. That is all.
I live in Texas now. Always go and watch the Jays play when they come into town!
how is this relevant?
Thanks, yeah these sticks are so underrated unlike their cousins (LP No., t-52, FFP, UC) but I think thats what makes them so damn great!
Sounds like you need to hit the gym.
*Brazzers*
Age | User | Title | Reddit | Cmnt | Points :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- 7 months | [jiehae17](/user/jiehae17) | [Everyday I'm Dumblin'](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/lic66/everyday_im_dumblin/) | here | 34 | 430 7 months | [Live4FruitsBasket](/user/Live4FruitsBasket) | [Every Day I'm Dumblin'!!!](http://www.reddit.com/r/gifs/comments/lgdjd/every_day_im_dumblin/) | [/r/gifs](/r/gifs) | 9 | 182 3 months | [zuperman219](/user/zuperman219) | [Michael Gambon's dance. Alan Rickman's face. Guy in background's stance.](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/pcxm3/michael_gambons_dance_alan_rickmans_face_guy_in/) | here | 1 | 123 * See **3 more** matches at [KarmaDecay](http://karmadecay.com/r/funny/comments/ueogl/every_day_im_dumblin/)  *This is an automated response*   [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/help/faqs/SimilarImageBot) | [Send Feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Feedback Id ueogl&amp;message=[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/ueogl/\) 'I like feedback') | [Report Error](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Error Id ueogl&amp;message=Have you read the FAQ? Please specify the error.[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/ueogl/\) 'Help me grow')
It was used to detain &amp; arrest many individuals. They just weren't charged under the law.
Hate to break it to you, but you bit on my trolling, hard :p
Isn't the voip on consoles implemented by the console os? I'm pretty sure it is.
I thought it said that at first glance too :P  It's definitely "My Red TT"
Your last scenario is why some of the same people looking at life extension and physical immortality also want a better understanding of how happiness and fulfillment work (and also why you hear a lot of "I want to decide when to die" instead of "I want to literally live *forever*").
Nah.  I think though there was some amazing stuff from then (eg MBV, Pixies), there was a lot of crap.  I'd pick today over the early 90s without hesitation.
“I don't even know them-some people say they were the neighborhood bullies that many of the kids had a problem with. I love animals and I can't stand to see cats get chased or dogs kicked. One cat already had his eye swollen shut by a rock. Animal abuse &amp; bullies are a HUGE problem here.” Aeylias adds.
Every Seattle Liberal take note, the state DOES NOT provide better than competition (free market). 
Looks like a MOUT course
Even tough I'm losing karma.... I prefer this meme hating reddit. 
What an apt analysis of Oda and the Harper government. Pinky and The Brain.
what part of texas? I'm in texas!
Damn you. :D
Soon.
I believe this is right. I don't think any caster, or any intelligent adult would give out what they made per event. The tournament organizers definitely wouldn't.
Are there any vaccines available? Try researching ways to prevent it. 
But you do watch porn.
It's been great. It's my longest relationship and still going strong.
My Rolex always gets mistaken for a Seiko, you assholes.
I'm fucking dying right now this is priceless.
already have one. 
Why that's barking mad!
so its basically Wipeout for kids, right?
Smooth.
Okay, sounds good. And you can bet I won't be doing that again. This situation has had me stresssinnnnnnnnnnnn'.
I am the same way, but I wash my face pretty often because I have oily skin. Still, I am extremely lazy to care of my skin too much. I can say this, if you have the money, definitely invest in a Clarisonic. Since I've been using it, my skin looks so much better. I have dark spots that have been disappearing, and I don't break out anymore. There was a period of time recently that I got too lazy to use it, and I began to get all the same skin issues as before. That's how I know for sure that it works, and I'll be sure not to get to lazy for it anymore. So yeah, I'd definitely recommend it. If it works for me--someone who doesn't go the extra mile to take care of my skin, and more than often falls asleep wearing makeup, etc.-- then I'll bet it'll work for you too. :]
salandra
Pic 2 is outstanding, probably the best arse I've ever seen.
.
Well, there's no such thing as a military career in wartime without  some personal risk...
I'd watch it though, but only if it's them or some other vapid celebrities who are nothing but oxygen wasters
Yeah. I scanned it with Malwarebytes and MSE, but nothing came up.
Not a native English speaker :)   /thread
Beautiful, I am jealous. I plan on building mine using SIPs as well. If you don't mind me asking, how much were the SIPs and where did you get them made?  Thanks.
It'll probably exist somewhere on the internet.
&gt;The economy is man made, we made it to ensure to ourselves a decent quality of life.  I don't have a background in economics or economic history, but this sounds a bit like a just-so story.  I don't think economic systems were put in place explicitly for human-flourishing in an idealized sense.  At best, I think you can say that the economy allows for individuals or groups to trade goods/services/labour for goods/services/labour they would not have had originally.  It aims at well-being, but only in an attenuated sense.  &gt;But by asking such a question, it seems like he's putting the economy above everything else... (...) It bothers me since he doesn't see that "the economy" is just an instrument, an invention to improve our lives... it's not an end.  But that's entirely the point of the boss's position.  Boss (I'll just use "Boss" as a proper noun here because typing he/she is getting cumbersome) isn't asking what liberal arts can do for politics; Boss is asking what it can do for the economy, as a national benefit.  People working and producing/consuming/trading is a part of the economy, and they function as instruments within the economy.  Let's put it another way: what good is studying philosophy if it doesn't lead to a job directly?  Why go tens of thousands of dollars into debt on somethings that probably won't have direct returns on the investment?  This is why liberal arts get's such a bad wrap - training in the sciences and trades is seen as more useful because there is a more explicit end-game.  How many people go to tertiary education in the liberal arts and then get employment in their field?  This is further compounded by there being no explicit "philosophy" jobs.  And you can't make the comparison with famous thinkers like Locke, Smith, Newton, etc.  Those thinkers lived in a time where there wasn't a demarcation between philosophy and science (political, economic, physical, etc).  Those sub-disciplines broke off from philosophy and started getting their own funding. There is a comment elsewhere in this thread that references that knowledge not shared or useful outside of the academy is not very good knowledge (practically speaking).  At the end of the day, you can think about well-being, metaphysics, or even ethics all you want.  But unless you are privately wealthy, have a patron, or also work for wages, you probably won't live very long without working within the economy.  If you do not possess skills and abilities that are demanded by someone else, you are of no use to anybody.  This is not to say philosophy students can't be of use, or their skills/abilities/knowledge isn't in demand; but it does seriously call into their question to directly adapt them into modern time.  I feel like I should mention that I disagree with Boss's assertion; I just think the response above doesn't give an adequate response that would satisfy their objections.  I'm playing devil's advocate.
Thanks, perhaps I'll start this diet now instead of waiting. Good luck on your recovery and happy losing! 
You are stranded in Brick? Curious... Also there is like 10 others near by me.
The people who are willing to enforce or defend that right, just like any other right.  Semi-unrelated note:  Those in the medical profession are some pretty well paid slaves.
That really eliminates a lot of stress.
This is probably the worst Beatles song ever. WTF Lennon.  
Do they think that straight men won't follow them to gay bars?
I almost asked "how's that?" and then realized in didn't want to know.
Kudos to your husband for being involved! That's awesome!  Hopefully this month will be the month for you. :)
It's a free drink.  Her acceptance of their largess is no indication of any unfaithfulness even if an unfaithful girlfriend would also accept the same.  This is true even if she engages them afterwards.  Often women will engage men in order to "pay" for the drink.  If she does it in front of you and engages them with you there without introducing you then I'd say you're getting into a trouble area.
Star wars.  After I saw Jar Jar,
Hell yes just got back into warband an this is sounds great
IP?
Well, you can just look into the class and count it. 16/8 bytes per instance overhead + 4/8 bytes for every reference field + the size of numeric primitive value fields (boolean takes 2 bytes, afaik). Then just round up to the next multiple of 8.  A nice presentation about it: www.cs.virginia.edu/kim/.../memory-efficient-java-tutorial.pdf
I have another secret game I will be playing over the weekend but I will definitely put psychonauts on the "to be streamed" list.  [](/hatwithit "You are welcome!")
oh thanks
&gt; I want my program to be able to do this no matter how long the string of numbers is  This is trivial if you use the standard library. Look at [`std::string`](http://www.cplusplus.com/reference/string/string/), [`std::getline`](http://www.cplusplus.com/reference/string/getline/), and [`std::reverse`](http://www.cplusplus.com/reference/algorithm/reverse/). Those are really all you need for a basic implementation.
might want to remove your email good sir
FIOS Internet is available in Cambridge, but not FIOS Tv.  I called and asked what was up with that, apparently Verizon and Cambridge haven't been able to agree on royalties and payments .  Till then were left with just FIOS Internet and phone options. 
I have bought every Humble Bundle yet (the ones that aren't numbered don't count), and I think I'm most excited for this one. I already had Psychonauts, but Amnesia and LIMBO were on my wishlist.
Doesn't this stuff have ASPARTAME.... I would say there ARE health concerns.
I'll do it
Laserjets are cheaper in the long run, but you'd have to print many thousands of pages to justify the cost. There should be numbers regarding the pages printed for your printer per cartridge, as well as for the laserjet you want. With some simple math, you'd figure out how many pages you'd need to print to make it worthwhile. 
Being a CS student in some far away country: sysadmin ports all our e-mail accounts to MSDNAA. Just log-in, choose a dozen of Microsoft software (servers, os xp-&gt;7, tools, etc.), download iso, burn, get key in mail :)  P.S. 0$
perhaps you do not know that the Russian army went into Afghanistan because the USA tried to overthrow the elected communist leader of the country... and there is more to it before than as well
Brown switches would be better. Softer. I used to use the blackwidow, hated it. Using a tkl ducky with brown switches. Much better, although I still like the marauder a lot (non mechanical).
Part of the allure of the anonymous mononym is that it has a large body of unwritten history. I'm not going to post it on Reddit. It was before my time, even, so I'm not entirely sure of it myself.
Lol. We'll see what happens, im a bad planner
Nicolas Cage as Princess Leia? Check. In slave bikini? Negatory.  My Nicolas Cage spank bank am slightly disappoint.
Gooby pls
That's one of the worst things about this whole debacle. People are not able to play because the servers are not in the mood.   Check out the [humblebundle](http://www.humblebundle.com/) if you haven't already. Well worth checking out and these games are drm free, too!
jelly legs, lol!   &gt;And take pictures of the things you find interesting.And take pictures of the things you find interesting.  Like what did you take pictures of? A carpet?
&gt;But if they use this 34% ip boost as the big surprise that was worth over 5 months of waiting. Then I'll lose faith in riot being a community centered company and is just in it for the money.  Really? You talk as if you're Fry's dog.  Stop being so dramatic.
Thanks, got Bastion on the second link. Much love!
And knowing is half the battle! G.I. JOE!!!!!
Oh ok I see what you mean.  I think we interpreted the question differently then.  The circlejerk thing is incredibly likely though, good point.
They're both MMOs. People only tend to play one MMO at a time. Ergo, the more saturated the market is, the less people likely to play your game. Therefore, Fallout: Online = Bad for TES online.
http://i.imgur.com/vdFwh.gif
My aunt used to hang out with the Earth Crisis guys.
If it had been me I would have threatened them with an ACLU shitstorm. Fucking disgusting that people like that are doctors. &gt;(
Thanks.  /r/OlderThanTheTubez   is exactly what I needed :)
I'm in a EU country and seriously? I'm the off to... Iceland or some shit
This exactly! I find this incredibly useful so you can give a heads up to your teammates headed in that direction of what to expect.
It's only episodic in Season 1 for about 5 or 6 episodes, then it becomes a serial style show through the second half of Season 1 and continuing through Season 3.
Céard fúm? :(
Honestly, I just don't see it.  Signing Johnson then drafting Ingram pretty much showed that English is on borrowed time.  Williams could get thrown in there also.  I think it will really come down to a camp battle and Larry English will lose.  Plus his cap hit is like 2.2 mil this year and 2.5 next if I'm not mistaken.  Wouldn't be sad to see him go, that's all.  I don't think people would be mad if he did well somewhere else.  What else can Norv do?  He's given him chances and he hasn't shown any progress.  Time to pull the plug...
ahh, I stand corrected 
without proper aid, I think it's impossible for a truck to jump a fence...so applejack is a property destroyer ala GTA and Saints Row....   [](/e07) girl's crazy y'all
I see these sort of posts a lot. "I just bought a ship - what should I do with it?", "I bought an alt - what do?", "I am in low sec - why?".  Find a reason, *then* do it.
**Original Submission (100%):** [Leashes](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/ud9kr) [[D]](http://imgur.com/reudG)   **Posted:** 20h before this post by *[asdfasdfvful](http://www.reddit.com/user/asdfasdfvful)* (fixed by *[snoglorph](http://www.reddit.com/user/snoglorph)*)  [This comment generated by an automated bot.](http://www.reddit.com/r/originalfinder/faq) [*Is this match wrong?*](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=original-finder&amp;message=%2A%2AIncorrect+match%3A%2A%2A+http%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com%2Fr%2Ffunny%2Fcomments%2Fueqq4%0A%0A%2A%2ACorrect+match%3A%2A%2A&amp;subject=Error%3A+ueqq4)
I've never seen a life jacket classified as a boat, so clearly no one gives a fuck about the rules around here.
I think it's the power station-y look that got me. Not quite the same, but still the first thing I thought of:  https://imgur.com/a/PnxZb
DAM! 8 Mins.
But that means she'll be able to be on 16 and Pregnant, and thus make a ton of money.  So it all works out in the end! 
Is that from Darkplace?
"The pigeons held a meeting today, here is what we know..."
[](/wahaha "Did somepony say Rarity?") True... an increase in the drop rate could also prove to be a dangerous idea, because then TNT will be too easy to get, and griefing will run rampant.  Splitting one gunpowder item into 8-16 gunpowder trails could be a solution, though.
I'll see if I can find it. The whole experience left me emotionally distraught and I think I deleted everything. If I can find it in my trash I'll send it your way.
No no no no no  No no no no no no no  Refrigerator
That's the first bit of art that I've seen of an asura that looked aggresive. Really great work, keep it up!
The charger is even more scary in this regard...its a fun car and has plenty of power for a sedan that size, but the weight of the car really makes the oversteer a bit violent. I'm thinking the kid should stick to FWD. 
Heh, I suppose.  ;)
have you seen a vagina they are nasty looking (so is the penis but im used to it)
I did something similar except me and my friend walked into a grocery store with tuxedos on with a top hat and a black cane. We walked up to an employee and asked what year it was. She said "2012". I then replied and said: "Higgins, it worked!" and then we ran out of the store.
He must be new here...LOL
President Obama's campaign will roughly spend ~1 billion. Romney's campaign will spend ~800 million. However, GOP SuperPACs will spend an additional 1 billion on top of that. These SuperPACs receive donations from few very wealthy individuals and have an extreme amount of influence of the election.   From the article, if you had bothered to read it &gt;$395 million from groups tied to the billionaires David and Charles Koch; $300 million from American Crossroads and Crossroads GPS, the fundraising powerhouses set up by Karl Rove and Ed Gillespie; $100 million from the pro-Romney super PAC Restore our Future — they will likely outspend Obama and Democrats in the House and Senate by at least a 2-to-1 margin
So is the point so the criminal cant counter-command the officer, or so the criminal doesnt know what the dog is being commanded for?
No? That rig doesn't even take 400w.
I don't mind...then again I'm odd I guess
What is it?  Can't open video links: master will kill me (not literally of course, but he'd be upset at the very least).
First of all, LOL!   Secondly, was she offended?  Shit (intended) happens, particularly when you are drunk and sexing.  Talk to her man, not us!
Wow, and here I was thinking that New York would only be one of the most expensive. I didn't know it was three of the most expensive.
You cannot let your parents dictate such large decisions in your life. You're an adult and if you allow them to sway you in this, you're giving them power over you and your happiness. That's something you can't give to them, and it's not fair for them to expect it. You need to simply tell them that this is how it's going to be, and they can love and accept their son for who he is or not. **Do not let them make you feel guilty.** If they decide they can't "live with it" and will "have to" cut you out of their life **that is on them**, **not you.** Parents have an amazing talent for making their kids feel guilty about things like this and it is completely their own doing.   Obviously you have to make the decision that is right for you, but that's how I see it. I think if a person is willing to disown their own child for the sake of anything like this (religion, race, sexuality, etc.) they deserve to be cut off. I don't believe in this type of "conditional love" when it comes to your kids and I think it's completely abhorrent of your dad to treat you this way. But as I haven't had it happen to me, I can't know how it feels. I really can't say "Tell your dad to screw off" because I know how hard that would be. It really boils down to what you're willing to lose.   **One piece of advice I will give you: you should tell your girlfriend.** It'll definitely wound her, but I think this issue is probably too big to keep from her for very long. It might hurt her more if you keep it a secret until the breaking point, while she is obliviously thinking everything is hunky dory. This goes double if you're thinking about leaving her for this. It's not really fair to blindside her. At least give her an idea of the issue since it effects you both. Besides, she might have some great insight on this. Good luck, man. This is a shitty situation all around and I hope you can work it out.   *Edited for some add-ons and boldy words. 
Tyler Perry better get on this
Welcome to the internet. No actually, fuck off.
Yesssssssss. Btw. I need a fancy badge like you kids.
(rambling) Something like take away any legal benefits of marriage, and re-instate them at a state level with things like "tax breaks for breeding partners" justified with statements like "breeding partners are required to keep our nation alive, we're going to reward anyone who enters into a marriage with the intention of producing children"?
You don't always need a reason to like something. I cant explain why I like turkey dinners; I just do.
Somebody post this to /r/jesusandairplanes.
Binding of Issac?
I had a deer like that when I was a kid...
Ahhh that's hilarious!!!
Ah, I was just thinking of the uncrewed version :(
I know exactly what you mean. It can definitely be a trigger for cigarettes. It just reinforces what I said earlier. You won't be successful if you don't have the willpower to quit. The pot helped me satisfy my cravings to smoke and it allowed me to do so in a manner that was nicotine-free. It still made me want a cigarette afterwards, but you just have to choose not to smoke.
I*
I looks like Ray Ramono assaulting a captive child
She's the fucking QUEEN. Any weapon fired by her will be touched faintly by the hand of God. Elizabeth will visit a sudden and terrible retribution into the assailants of the Anglo race.   Anyways, those rounds are coming out at a CRACKING pace. Best give the old bird her space. 
I'm pretty sure dairy products are exempt... it probably has to be carbonated or something. 
Nice skin tone, tanned just right.
If drug prohibition didn't exist, that guy might still have a face.
You can use your hands to fondle her breast and pleasure her clit. 
These chicks are brain dead as fuck...  Edit: Is this a joke? Seriously... this seems like a total put-on. I dunno internet... I JUST DON'T KNOW
Dat Kantian sublime...
Dogs do. I'm not sure about weeks; but it's highly advised to give a dog their own "space" (usually a kennel) so that they can have alone time.  http://www.humanesociety.org/animals/dogs/tips/crate_training.html
Best of luck!
Yes, I would buy one right now! 
Happens to me too. Says its gonna run a file from application data but the exe is not there. I put it there manually, but still does nothing.
iPhone app called Mr. Number. 
I have 5MB upload, but it's only uploading at 123KB/sec. Is it because of some settings? I don't have any limits set for uploading.
This is an accurate re-enactment of a fweddit roam
i started wayy back in infdev (before alpha)
Learn to play guitar like a fucking monster, and drums, and hire professional fighters and actors to simulate fights between famous ppl, like lady gaga vs sarah palin
i can't share that view at all. modern corporations are psychopathic entities that exist only to make money, nothing more. i don't believe they give to shits for the people of Canada or the environment.
Austinite here who used to live in Binghamton. Confirming that Wegmans is baller as hell.
Thanks!!! Great advice. I am using an old system where I need the person's actual signature, I have to write their info down on paper to store their signature for records  and then later enter it in the system. I have just bought a dell tablet pc and am trying to make these steps more productive by signing the tablet and just printing out the document. 
&gt; It only worked enough to see everything on the drive, about 15 secs  That's what makes me think you were shown a cache ghost. Seeing directory entries is one thing; actually reading a file is another.  &gt; star screwdriver  Those are [torx drivers](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Torx).   As for sterility, the more sterile the better the chances of recovery. I do know the clean room shops can do this kind of thing, but then I know the clean room shops have all sorts of spare drives around to cannibalise one into another. If someone who worked in one did an AMA, that'd be great!
isellonions@smugglers.net
Job interview. The good comes with the bad. :(
I'm a girl and I love it!
The England team has been a circus for the last decade. I would not be surprised if Carrick shared the same views as [Paul Scholes](http://www.dailymail.co.uk/sport/football/article-2013003/Paul-Scholes-I-wanted-winning-England-team-greedy-players-just-personal-glory.html) and his pride of playing for the flag is negated by all the selfishness in the squad.
hah you're right about communism, sorry about that. If I read it right, he's saying that east germans *seemed* to like communism, but they were just being forced into it and escaped as soon as they could. I don't know enough about unions in WI to really comment on it, but I'd like to know the results of an earlier poll to compare- is the 39 percent a jump from earlier?
It's great to see them in the wild innit
I demand the truffle shuffle.
Thanks for the research, and time spent.  Worthy read for any one truly interested. 
Although its not good when it wants to get out.
Everyone should watch this video once they've made their clones! http://www.reddit.com/r/gamedev/comments/u75rh/juice_it_or_loose_it_how_to_make_a_game_feel/
....Great another DC fighting game, using designs from the DC Online trailer. 
Have you guys contacted Dr. Robert Zubrin? http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Mm34Muv6Lsg
I do read the Guardian, that's a neat trick! What's my favourite colour?
i was just talking about this with someone  its basically armor that you can get away with wearing, definitely what i will be wearing when we do encounter the zombies
I see your point and although I haven't seen the original, it does seem to be exactly the same.  But actors, directors and producers at this level also choose their work carefully, which may be why Penelope Cruz decided to do the same role a second time.
don't forget michigan. he doesn't get much attention, but Rick Snyder is almost as bad as Scott Walker and Rick Scott. he passed a bill that allows him to remove elected members of local government from office and appoint "emergency financial managers" that are, for all intents and purposes, above the law.
Same song, different verse.  For my money Gordon's Gin is almost as good as Beefeater, Bombay, etc, and for only $10 a fifth.
Possibly a pair of drumsticks? A cymbal? The thing I am also fair-ish at is animating.  Maybe a cursor? I have no clue... 
I hope you like it.  It's definitely one of my favorites.  
An internet day is an hour.  So, stranger...?
Nice.
Oh, okay. Just for money purposes I think I'm going all inclusive, but I have decided on the DR so I am pretty excited. 
I think the reason VOIP isn't integrated into a lot of PC games is because Skype and Ventrilo are already a standard, and they don't see it as being a necessary addition to spend money on.
I would love to. :D
i'dhitit
 &gt;Henderson would still feel like shit if he read this thread in a hypothetical world.  He's a grown man and a professional sportsman. I think he can handle it, we aren't here to mollycoddle him. I'm sure he wouldn't like the criticism too much, but all the "you're the best!" spirit in the world won't help him improve. If he's shit, we're calling it.  Why shouldn't they be upset at the inclusion of Henderson? He's not good enough. No offence but England is a footballing nation, we expect more than the USA and so don't share the same carefree attitude. I'm a bit at a loss for your mention of the group thing, it seems a bit selective memory. I don't mean to be rude, but the whole go yankees attitude thing hasn't really helped you in the last 100 years of being a vastly inferior footballing nation. England has incredibly passionate fans, but like I said, they are also very critical. This is not a bad thing, but when the media jumps on it and starts killing them it does get out of hand and is certainly not a good thing for team morale or performance. I do put a lot of blame on recent performance on the media and how they handled it. Our press is vile, but that's not the same thing as fans rightfully questioning the inclusion of generally sub-par players.
we're fully stocked in the fridge.
Humility and Living Lands is my White/Green EDH deck.  Can you say power to the land.
hopefully this is a loop. ends at VIP_trips  = 3? 4?
What are the STEM fields like? I'm wondering if this is across the board or if certain fields are taking it worse than others.
As someone who only achieved Gold/Best in School, Bronze and silver respectively for Junior, Intermediate and Senior, I am jelly.  Congratulations!
I did 20 hours a couple times, I just had to pay a little extra. Not sure how much it was, though. 
It's commitment to his craft.  I commend it.
[Uh huh.](http://www.youtuberepeat.com/watch/?v=Ip7YZ894th4)
Edna Pontellier walking into the ocean at the end of Kate Chopin's The Awakening. Her suicide is her ultimate and final awakening.
Sure, why not?
The way he plays is not wrong. He's taking tips and letting people know that he prefers something, that doesn't mean he's ignoring the advice.
yea, nick.com when they had all those games you could play.
The appendix is actually supposed to house bacteria that help with the breakdown other bacteria that is harmful to the human body in the left over food in the large intestine.  When the large intestine is empty of the food the bacteria is said to reside within the appendix so as to not destroy the insides of the large intestine.  It only explodes when the appendix becomes blocked when leftover food in the large intestine find a way into the opening of the appendix causing a blockage not allowing the bacteria to go out and do its job the right way.  This in turn changes the bacteria's course to eat away at the actual appendix itself instead of the leftover food weakening the tissue, causing it to rupture.
awwww 
Grown men in their 40's.
djcookie187187187187
Supply Tech at a hospital.   Nurses and Doctors need their medical supplies, me and a few other people make sure they have them.
I find it hard to drink plain water, just because our city's water is... Well, blegh. I've found that Mio (it's this stuff you can squirt into your water to give it flavor) helps a ton, and it's 0 calories. Most of the time I don't even squirt enough to make it taste like a kool-aid-like drink in there, but just enough to where it doesn't have a weird city water taste, and gives it a light freshness. There are even some with caffeine. My favorite is the blueberry lemonade, though. 
Less than *always* would be a pity.
Sticker on my car, small, wear a staff of caduceus necklace constantly.  I want to get a full tattoo on my back, someday, because medical is where my heart has always been, not just ems. 
WHY WOULD YOU TELL ME THAT?!
Aw. My mom craved Oreo Blizzards from Dairy Queen while she was pregnant with me. :)
I agree. They aren't the worst cables I have ever bought but they aren't the best either. It is the only product from monoprice that I have ever bought that I wouldn't give a 10/10 rating to. I would say a solid 7/10 or 8/10  especially when considering the price.
Well, I'm telling you that putting it lower than eye level helped me out.
That's ridiculous. That means any two random people off the street can put armor on and start a battle!
You'll just get groups that pop up and claim the candidates as theirs.  You could even have candidates tune the answers to get claimed by the popular groups and have no way of proving it.  People want shortcuts and winning teams... they will get them one way or another
We will work on changing these numbers tomorrow. We had just calculated two semesters and the summer. We will add in another 6 weeks. I will post here when the work is done. 
Yes, it is when I try and go back to the setup screen from enabling it that it goes wrong
D'oh! Too slow  Edit: Thanks for the chance though !
Sell!   Everyone take losses.   
I saw that, I wish so damn badly I had taken advantage of it!
Sit in the server room in the bottom part of the map and don't do anything stupid.  That's it really.
I live half way across the planet and can tell he's a dick from here.
Was it chalk or paper?
"Am I just sad, or have I been glutened? Is that zit a gluten zit or a PMS zit? Is this stomach cramp from some unknown cross-contamination or just normal indigestion?" I go through those questions a lot. 
Meh. I got a 1201N which heat crashes constantly. Real piece of crap. Also, the battery life is shit. Bought it for the nvidia card but every time I tried any 3D apps the damn thing would shut itself off.
My guess is June 5th when the DVD comes out.   On The Season 3 DVD they had a trailer for Season 4.  
i have that same one and also named it gir luls
Oh so it takes stress off of the synchros and makes them last longer. Thanks
Me. Sorry about that, I just really hated Labour. :(
Not a bad idea. Thanks for the tip!
I read that three times and every time I somehow left out the word 'sock'. I was confused.
You did the right thing with the sand as the last layer, it should help keep it all in place. When doing bigger areas such as a patio, I would use a plate compactor. But your's turned out just fine =)
Wow, a goddamn hippie being a hypocrite. That's surely a surprise.
They needa make those monkeys feedable to the troll. I have a bunch sitting in my bank right now clogging up my space. 
I loved s&amp;s, give it a chance. It grows on you.
&gt;Most things store brand.  Notable exception: Q-tips.
You could time it with the lyrics and fuck in the Fibonacci Sequence.
Goodness, a dick calling me an asshole. My ego...RUINED!
The Looong con
Kickstarter is for anyone who wants any amount of money for nearly any purpose. If they want to boost their production considerably, they could use it. Kickstarter didn't even start for games. It started for fundraising in general. 
I've been happy with the quality of Sager laptops as well.
I was joking earlier but maybe I should get a "turnover" on the top of my wrist :P
Congrats...and nice username :P
That sounds really cute!
You can buy a house in Vegas with a bucket of quarters...  
If you want to save this for a few days I would be happy to grind up the 800k gold that flim said this was worth.
Miniature dachshunds are the coolest, has to be a mini though the regular size one are shit heads lol.   Edit: by shit head I mean the often can't hold their bladder when they are excited, they are sometimes shorter tempered and become overweight easier causing many health problems.
I join trying to spot deals.
For her? Yes.
Tea isn't supposed to be especially bitter, that usually happens when it's oversteeped, and it's easy to oversteep greens especially :)  I've never tried this particular tea, seems it's somewhere around the below average to average range based on various reviews and things. 
No problems man I'm just gathering a bunch of rough estimates
Efil, use ENIOLATE!
My frient, go back to your home on whore island. Sincerely, every ent that ever existed. And Ron Burgundy...
Aww c'mon... Silva was not engaging in that fight like he should have.  Wasn't giving it the proper effort, it was a lackluster performance.   It's not the end of the fight that upset me (besides that I like Cote and hated to see him injured like that).
I think it's crazy how much some sets cost. The new LOTR ones cost so much, it must all be licensing. The little gandalf arrives set, with him on his carriage is 17 bucks, it's such a tiny set though, it should be like 10.  EDIT: went to toys r us, fixed prices
everything with Adam Sandler in it. Every notice you can tell how old people are by whether they like AS or not? If they do, they are less than 35, if not, over 45. (rough estimates only!)
Too bad about those kids in Africa who make $5 a month.
actually it was on here i personally caught a few dupers doing this when we hade it implented 
I could, but I'm not sure what a screen shot will tell you.  It's an Iron door, with a button on the right. :-/
It almost pains me to say it, but I really like the woman.
生コラーゲンドリンク お試し情報サイト
Removed - Picture of comments. Please submit the original comment to /r/bestof or /r/worstof.
FFS. Of all the times to not be in Edinburgh.
Are we safer now then we were 10 years ago? Definitely. Al Qaida is fractured and the organization is not as powerful as it once was.   Was it worth the money on lost lives? Not at all. I disagree with the US having 1.4 million troops on the ground, spending $3 trillion dollars &amp; having to pay for the veterans that have lost limbs or have PTSD. That was not worth it - which is why I like using drones instead. It's cheap. It doesn't put American lives in danger. 
That's nuts.
Gotta start somewhere! Welcome to the club.
I just try my best to ignore it and remember that those people are idiots and that no matter what I say they will still be idiots. It's best just to go on letting them be stupid.
Ummmm
thanks, I knew I had the wrong word
I did not realize Archer's lead animator was so young, he is really talented for his age!
OH CRAP! GIT IT OFF! GET IT OFF!!!
It's beautiful that they found each other.
Same scenario applies...
Why do you call Cyborgmatt "Cyborgfail" that's not very nice is it?
More to the point is that Parker is borderline injured and Gerrard has probably had his worst season for Liverpool in terms of injuries and performance. Their collective potential is what England are relying on.
this is a great interview about how long ago the process to create this movie was started - right after forgetting sarah marshall
Converted all my friends to Tito's. It's honestly just as good as the premium brands.
What does "controversial" actually mean in terms of Reddit? Whatever gets the most downvotes?
For a long time, I didn't try. I forcused on myself, as I needed to (when you're fighting addiction, it's really easy to replace an addiction to a substance with an addiction to a person, or emotion - I needed to be alone for a while to figure stuff out.) But now I'm just kind of lost as to how to start out...
You should try the clipper lighter, it's aweome because the roller is 'clipped' so it's much easier to light! Should be able to find them in your local head shop!
Maybe it will be three small boobs ! :O
Now run with him
Reminded me of (yes I know, as old as the internet) [this](http://i.imgur.com/hczYH.gif).
It's ok, it was an SMC.  Sorry to hear about the other hardware, though.
Thanks!
I think we can both agree on that. I meant in general for the masses. 
I slipped in the mud at the MN state fair and the DJs at KDWB put me on air and gave me a free t shirt. 15 minutes of pure MN tween fame. 
some thing tells me this guy is from england and his surname ends with E....google it.( ;
I don't have anything offhand, but [this article cites](http://www.psychologytoday.com/blog/the-teenage-mind/200906/marijuana-sleep-and-dreams) from a study in 1975 that talks about less rapid eye movement, REM, in "experienced marijuana users". This is me being hasty in my reply, but there are studies out there, old and new, that have agreed that it disrupts or adjusts circadian rhythms.  edit: I only googled "cannabis sleep studies" and used a top link. I'm sorry if it isn't accurate or satisfying your interest. I'm in a rush.
The idea that a good businessman would make a better public office holder than a non-businessman makes as much sense as the idea that a political office holder makes a better businessman over someone who has never held office....
Seriously...
I very much disagree; it's just a small popdown. It even comes disabled by default, you have to specifically enable it yourself. Otherwise you can just pull down whenever you have a second to check what it is.
I would not want to be in a long term relationship with someone who didn't love me. Is it a reason to break up? Yes... it is. There are some people that when they fall out of love they go and sleep with everything else in sight.  You will find the girl that loves you back. A relationship with love going only one way is not a good way to live.
Yes, ads which can say anything, lie egregiously and never be refuted. Nor may they be laid to blame at the foot of the candidate whom they support.  And the ads funding is completely anonymous.  Yep, seems legit.
Could it be [Bored to Death](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8pcWzX8J_YA&amp;feature=fvwrel)   There's a recurring character that is Jason Schwartzman's rival, I think at one point he refers to him as an arch enemy and Zach Galifianakis responds with that line.  edit: changed the link to a better video.
already have one...  goes with my sniper kit
Do I have to do that every time I ride in the rain?  It seems like a lot of work.  Or is it like a once a month or two thing?  Cool video though!!!
I'd fuck her.
As of now, 70% of the people who voted on your comment don't understand Irish humour and were too lazy to read your username. If you value karma, I'd recommend you stop being witty and start being politically correct. If not, as a human being, I'd think a lot better of you.
How else do you want him to win against players doing the same thing? 
You mean just the regular ticket machines? I've never seen any on top... But maybe I wasn't looking hard enough?
Amnesia is the best game that I am aware of that runs natively on Linux.
You are all of you mistaken! Crunchy m&amp;m's are the ultimate m&amp;m.
I oft remark about folks "grousing" on a particular topic, that likely also identifies my origin just as easily.  Interestingly Wisconsinites are not known as "badgers" because of the prevalence of the animal (of which I've never seen one outside a zoo) but because the original honkie/German farming settlers were fond of digging their homes into the side of hills and living as the badger does - in order to best take advantage of the protection from our most unpredictable weather patterns.  (Non Wisconsin people mind find it interesting that the high in Beloit on Sunday was 99, the hottest recorded temp in America, whereas today it is 51* and raining.  In fact, later that night it was in the 60s)
Dog is a boss
yeah it was really sad, did you like it though? i hate how everyone just thinks it's a depressing movie that has no point 
Welcome! I would friend you but I already have six people, so I wouldn't be able to help. I left the country for 2 months  and unfortunatly didn't get the February and March dragons! So angry! 
My favorite release thus far is the [Sam Coffey/Shakey Aches *Banana Split*](http://hoseheadrecords.bandcamp.com/album/banana-split). Great fucking album, released on a [yellow cassette](http://hoseheadrecords.bigcartel.com/product/sam-coffey-and-the-iron-lungs-the-shakey-aches-banana-split)(in 100 copies).
Both 4chan and reddit.
Yea, if you watch the trailer closely you'll see several new weapons and armor.  I'm not sure if that's dragonbone or not, or just some sort of dawnguard weapons package.  I noticed a new axe (silver maybe), a new dawnguard shield, three new armors (or two armors and a clothing - not sure on that) plus the crossbows (which I'm hoping they will have for the different perks since one they showed looked like a Nordic style weapon (hoping they have ebony, dwarven, etc).
I played a game with a barb that had asian characters for his name, he talked frequently but all he said was "look here", "no", and "want [item]?".  A week or so later i played with a demon hunter, decent player and somewhat decent gear for our level, for almost 2 hours. 30 minutes before i had to go. After offering him serveral items that were good for him, even items that i was saving for my DH, he says "Dude your monk is badass, i wish i could stay alive like you can". Not a single word after that until i said i had to go and he said "Bye".
I feel like this is exactly how couples are going to cuddle and have sex even date.  Together physically but always in front of some kind of computer device!
Why are the Hog's not account wide?  WHY!
Spoken like ugly incarnate.  Well done.
If you really want to freak them out, next time do it in 2010.
its really sad, but one person out of thousands?
Well the mustang is new, so one of the two 4x4s is going to be going. I used the F-250 for work at my previous job to haul stuff to tech conferences. The Wrangler was my toy/semi-everyday car. My family also has 400 acres so its nice to have something I can drive around on the property with... and everyone knows Mustangs are shit when it snows/rains/someone sneezes on the ground lol, so gotta keep one of them.
Thanks for opening my eyes to the greater details I didn't think about. There definitely is a bunch that is missing. Should things like second assist and how many breaks thrown/breaks thrown against you be added?  And as far as stats keepers go, I completely agree with your #4.
This is more offensive to me than most hardcore pornography
Datura, Model Glue, Human Blood
I'll admit, I'm guilty of paying something like that for a pound of costume jewelry- in my defense, it was really nice stuff that looked like it'd be easy to repair (it was!) and I flipped it for about five times that. Gold and silver holds it's value, but people still shell out for flashy pieces of costume jewelry. 
Mitt Romney, so Americans will reevaluate the political system. 
I hope you get more.
I don't take my tv dinners cold, I'm sure as Hell not going to have  my earth be that way!
Unfortunately, I think this is going to be way beyond buried, but oh my goodness everybody NEEDS to check out EarBombz headphones.  I went in to buy some Shures and came away with EarBombz Pros for $40; they're the best headphones I've ever owned.  I've had both the Bose in-ear and IE2 earbuds, Etymotics, and Klipsch S4s, and somehow, these are the best ones.  The bass response alone is enough to warrant the purchase at $40, but the mids and trebles are at least as good as the Bose pairs that I've owned, and the soundstage is fantastic as well.  For $40.
It's been nearly fucking impossible to find lard, let alone cheap lard, around Boston.
The traditional way.  Porn.
I'm not in it for the points, it just so happens that I already posses the game and I just figured since they're giving the key separate from the others that it would be good to give to someone who does not have it yet. And there is an option to gift a game when purchasing indie keys.
I don't think you will notice a difference between 6 and 2 row. Just go with what you have on hand. I'd mash around 155f.  Ferment as cold as you can get it but no worries if its around room temp. I'd certainly use irish moss, in every beer but a weisse of sorts. Just toss in the last 10 or 15 of the boil. If you can afford it, a nice flameout or 1min addition of that other half oz of cascade will give some nice flavour and aroma without adding bitterness.
9/11 was probably an inside job, considering how many aspects of the entire day do not line up, and how it was a great excuse to get in the Iraq/Iran conflict for the purpose of oil. I can elaborate if anyone wants me to. 
I feel bad now.
It reminds me of this one time in Zaboo-land!!!!
The Dark Elf Trilogy, or Bone.
it dosent look like it :(
This kid needs to grow that beard out. He's got a very weak chin.
Same. At first I was like... She doesn't want to play Diablo so you play so... OH! It's a sex joke.
Thanks for that mental image...
What inflated rhetoric?  My statement about accurate sound vs colored sound?  Really, though, your statement might sound logical to the naive reader, but saying that sounding good is good is not right.  Well, maybe to you, if you don't care about sound reproduction, but saying everything else is bullshit is, well, bullshit.  What if you had a camera that took pictures of friends, family, whatever, and the pictures didn't look like the original, but people who did not know the original subjects said, "Hey, that picture looks good!".  Does that mean the camera is good, and cameras that take pictures that actually look like the original is bullshit?  Surely this is not really what you think?  
Oh. Wow, it's all coming back to me. I... **I'M NOT WORTHY!** *sob*
don't stress about it, it's really a pretty simple program that errs MASSIVELY on the side of not plagarizing
I think you spelled that wrong.
Put the boots to him, medium style.
My thoughts. 
You just discovered rubbernecking? 
pursuant to this thread, and not directed to anyone in particular, the question I ask myself is, "will I notice?" When thinking about the Acoustimass system in particular, I don't really watch a lot of movies where 5.1 or 7.1 is going to matter. So for *me*, Bose would probably be good enough. Mostly I just want the stuff I buy to be reliable and to work as advertised, and if I get both of those, I'm happy.
&gt; That almost sounds like something Microsoft would do!  Well... yeah. Though to be fair, Microsoft does come up with some cool prototypes and ideas before they scrap them and disappoint us all.  &gt; That monstrosity has five buttons right below the screen, and the ring might even be a directional pad. Would I be wrong if I assumed that those weren't just there for show?  I used to have the Dell Axim X30. They're mostly for show. They're supposed to be useful, but completely unnecessary.  &gt; You answered my question with "Windows Mobile" when the correct answer would have been "none".  Probably. I'm sure Windows Mobile isn't that unique either and it's built off work that other companies and people have done. When it comes to large ass corporate suit douche companies like Apple, they DO NOT INVENT. They do not have the ability to invent. They do not have the environment to allow people to be creative and invent. They do not attract inventive people. THEY DO have money, and can buy up (or muscle out with legal warfare) the naive and optimistic tiny companies made of creative and energized people before they suck them dry.  There are very few corporations that are "human" and usually it's because of the CEO and the leadership. Strong and compassionate people at the top of the foodchain means a human and decent company. There are very few.
I was so disappointed in the movie. Especially because I loved the casting of Lyra. 
I'm not interested, but as a tip, you might want to link a screenshot to the load out screen that shows the part so no one thinks you're trying to rip them off :) Hope you can recoup your losses somewhat!
Me either.  I think the OP is messing with us. 
that is some messed up stuff.  [direct link](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_Army_Special_Forces_selection_and_training#Death_during_ROBIN_SAGE)
Is it on a server?
I've always wanted a goat for a pet, what are they like? Can they be trained to stay in a yard, or would it need to be fenced in? Do they come to the sound of their voice?
Obviously you have never heard of the CMP. Two weekends ago I was in a store chock full of nothing but U.S. Milsurp guns and ammo. 
Awesome pair you have there :)
my school had 2 required semesters of gym, and they were completely useless.  Taking gym classes will never make you thin, even if it's just running every damn day. Diet is the single most essential part to getting thin.
Oh, you sound just about perfect.  Anywhere near PA?
Take me with you next time!!!
was checking yugico and saw it at 6 bucks so i thought it was a steal =P
Visio literally had no customer service a few years ago. They were dirt cheap and crappily made but so cheap they made a big entry into the market. Then they raised the price some and fixed some of their problems. But for years they were horrible with countless support horror stories.   I will never ever buy Visio. 
Or an Audi.....
Come back in 7 weeks.
In the article he says the company needs to "blow itself up" and that in may be too late to save the WWE. It's all just sensationalist bullshit. He goes on to not recommend, but to state everything that should change. As if if the WWE said fuck it let's just do what he says, the whole thing would change for the better. People seem to think that because people are entitled to an opinion, that the world deserves to, no, HAS to know about it. I agree with some of the points, but you can't just apply the ADD generations way of watching things to how a business operates. You can't just up and fire everyone who doesn't draw or who isn't worth screentime in the eyes of the IWC. Fuck it's 1AM.
What exactly do you mean when you say "string of integers"? Strings and integers are two specific things with regard to C++. The phrase "string of integers" doesn't mean anything in this context.  Are you talking about a `String` that only has numerical characters? Are you talking about a single `int` with multiple digits? Are you talking about a group of multiple `int`s?  It would be helpful if you could post some code so we could see exactly what you're trying to do.
.......So then press 'x'. TA-DA! You've respawned! Also the sniping scenario was an example. If you've ever played Halo, you know that there are times where you die and you just can't make sense out of what exactly happened.
Dart Gun. Simple answer to Deathclaws and Reavers. Once their legs are crippled it's like dicking around with Mirelurk Hunters.
Yes! Over and over again!
Time to do some reading, thanks! :D
I know he's right. :)  I recently started my first grown-up job, one that sits me in a desk and pays salary instead of hourly, and I'm already thinking about going back to physical labor to avoid feeling sore every day.
What country do you live in where you dont hqve a full time job at 29??? We just had a phd baby so no kids for a while
Public games are safe, that whole rumour was just bullshit
ojala se las cumplan
Mind blown? I suppose you are not familiar with the concept of frilly toothpicks.  you're out of the fuckin club!
You made a political and philosophical argument for a scientific issue.  Show the science.
I highly recommend "Broadcast News" then. She and Albert Brooks are incredible.
It's a cookie made out of girl scouts.
I'm going, we should meet up!
That's known as a sack-rumbler round these parts.
i hope
Spyderco Michael Walker Lightweight (C37PS)
[album](http://imgur.com/a/Rt4Hk#53)
I'm assuming you are talking about enemy bodies. Dump them all into a quantum stockpile and then crush it with an atom smasher. Make sure all of this is either outdoors or in a room behind a door to prevent miasma leakage.
I may be a crazy person, but I'm of the opinion that a briefcase should be carried like, well, a briefcase. I think it'd look much better if you held it by the handle and lost the strap, assuming this isn't unnecessarily arduous for your use (walking extremely long distances or needing both of your hands free). It gives a classier appearance, I think.
I married a woman from the Philippines after being married with 4 kids in North America. I wish I had married her sooner and had kids with her instead. My kids in NA are spoiled brats who only want money. The kids here are the sweetest little people on Earth. They are friendly, funny, affectionate, and generally irresistible. I wish I could adopt all of them.
The label seems worn and I can't read it really. 
"And an organization few people know about can overturn anything derabbanan…"
[looks kind of like this](http://www.canaltcm.com/myfiles/ap/igor-char2.jpg)
That is absolute bullshit. When she says "some scientists" ask her which ones. Until then, that which is asserted without evidence can be dismissed without evidence.
Lol. I've been all about the seducing. It works most of the time. But most of the time rarely falls around the fertile time, that's what ends up being the most frustrating. 
Hey there KittenQuinzel, I'd love to chat with you. I'm just finishing my first year of college, and I'm in a similar situation. I'm a general artsy-fartsy type, and I could talk for hours about anime. I've also traveled quite a bit; maybe we could swap stories. I hope that, wherever you end up, you manage to have a good time. Feel free to message me.
They have some good stuff, but the records are kind of pricey.
Mean.
Lmfao
[](/tiara) You are the worst pilot to me right now.
Exactly!
Just blame god for Obama being elected, tada! 
http://i.imgur.com/TW8UJ.jpg  http://static.fjcdn.com/pictures/Chocolate+Milk.+Description_7a4b07_3601110.jpg  http://static.fjcdn.com/large/pictures/8e/1d/8e1dcc_2779121.jpg
&gt;If your down in the hole you want to dump it forward over your head  DYEL???
[](/a25) You just had to put My Little Dashie in the title.
Looks Good At The Underpass Nice View [See Here](http://imagetwist.com/17jvu3nufyeq/p9pvjrldf4pa.jpg.html)
Awww, it looks so sad.
Don't say sorry: Just improve.  This applies to mistakes you've made, not necessarily offering condolences.
Is that why that tree always has chirping when I go near it? I though it was a broken sound entity. I've had it on each save on Xbox and PC.  I'll check this out next time I get on.
He has retired from making public appearances.
I can't believe I never knew this about Nebraska until it was too late.
Correct, OP needs to hold breath for the duration of the bath and everything should be fine.
They would certainly show more remorse when someone got trampled to death.
I only have one cousin, and it's a girl - so I doubt it.
i love it! i have a broken mag light that im thinking of doing this to.
what am i looking at??...
Yeah, white people *always* get the shitty end of the stick on *everything*. It's hard to be oppressed.   &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
also some great Castlevania, Metroid, and Megaman titles. As well as a decent Zelda game.
I don't give out private information but I am in Illinois, if you are too feel free to PM me.
Oh man, you almost got me there. 10/10
This kills the person
You know, i prefer it the way it is now. You, Arsenal, Trophyless for 7 years and counting. Stop being such a fucking hater. or keep crying like a bitch, either is good.
Oh yeah, I get the characters' personas mixed up sometimes when I read too fast. Reading it the first time I expected Eugene to blast away, killing all four of them.   Almost anyone else in Rick's merry band of survivors would have not backed down given that situation.
For now, because it just reached open beta.
I think that my personal favorite live metal performance of all time is [Metallica - Harvester of Sorrow](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7uYNl67JawU) live at moscow. It's remained one of my faves, I love the scenes of the soviet army beating the crap out of the audience. A close second would be [Arch Enemy - Blood On Your Hands](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=33U3bGZOcX8).
'Murica?
Mine is my initials, followed by completely random numbers. Ya, riveting.
Jumanji
What a shame. Not enough gold from CW conquests to pay the rent, I guess.
Here is one for you. Backhands = Benjin.
I agree. I would like to see some more non-traditional locations host the Super Bowl. I am looking forward to a New York Super Bowl, and would definitely love to see it in Seattle. 
Oh it's you again. And you're right, always back up and restore with iTunes when upgrading firmware. 
Their laundry detergent is fantastic. Won Consumer Reports top spot last year I think, too.
Well... When I walk up there, and see 3 backs turned to me, it warms my heart.  Eventually they will realize that there should be more discreet spots.
stick in there man. We are a forest of friendly ents. We aim to please
i cringed hard, my upvote to you sir
Ah good to know about two props vs one! I've only ever driven boats with one prop and I could see how docking/maneuvering would be easier with two.  What other kinds of engines are there besides gas? I didn't even know they made boats with electrical engines...
Here we also see the snowmobile evolving into a couch.
I'm fine if a friend mentions mine to a d100.
Finally someone gets it right!
Hugely appreciated if possible
Meta keywords are at best, unnecessary, and at worst, harmful.  They are absolutely not a ranking factor in Google or Bing, and some have even suggested that it may actually *hurt* your rankings because it is a sign of spaminess, although I am very hesitant to believe that.  They can also be used by competitors as an easy way to pull the keywords you're targeting for each page.  The only time they are ever useful is certain directories or social bookmarking sites that automatically pull the meta keywords when you're supposed to enter tags for a submission, but those instances are few and far between and certainly aren't the type of links you should be truly concerned with obtaining.
The ever elusive hot bird.
agreed, while its far better than I could ever hope to achieve, it does seem rather cluttered. Nice job though!
How is their space program doing?
I believe that the blood in his eyes was a major factor, but I think Cain would win a rematch. What was lucky was that Bigfoot was dumb enough to through a half-hearted lowkick on a wrestler...
Oh man, so glad I could help!  Hopefully you'll have some even better sex because of it.  Good luck!
So, is the speculation that he is Asian based on his nipple color correct?
Blacksmith will be pretty useless in Softcore.
awesome interpretation.
Any corrupt politician is evidence that the voting populace isn't smart enough to pick their representatives, so we need the government to pick them for us.
**Original Submission (100%):** [GG Texan](http://www.reddit.com/r/AdviceAnimals/comments/ue6no) [[D]](http://i.imgur.com/UB26E.jpg)   **Posted:** 6h before this post by *[HMRN_SWNG](http://www.reddit.com/user/HMRN_SWNG)* (fixed by *[Poptorts](http://www.reddit.com/user/Poptorts)*)  [This comment generated by an automated bot.](http://www.reddit.com/r/originalfinder/faq) [*Is this match wrong?*](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=original-finder&amp;message=%2A%2AIncorrect+match%3A%2A%2A+http%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com%2Fr%2FAdviceAnimals%2Fcomments%2Fueqon%0A%0A%2A%2ACorrect+match%3A%2A%2A&amp;subject=Error%3A+ueqon)
Reports of drunken disorderly conduct on the Citadel continue to rise following the opening of Commander Shepard's new bar on the Presidium, The Captain's Quarters.  When asked for a comment the galactic hero responded, "...I should go."  More details as they emerge.
See these are the things that trees needs to be putting on the front page. Get the word out.  Not a MFW .gif.  Great find sir, hopefully my uptoke aids in r/all seeing this.
If, by posting this to /r/science, you meant to give a perfect example of confirmation bias, then yes. Otherwise -- grow up.
I want to try.
Is there a god?
I think it would be something I would never want to improve purely down to the enjoyment me and my friends etc get out of my singing voice  But I do agree with the sentiments said the journey is always the best part!
The highlighted regions of that map show the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland (a political distinction). The big island on the right containing England, Scotland and Wales is called Great Britain. The smaller island on the left containing Northern Ireland and the Republic of Ireland is known as Ireland. 
Word. I got an Alienware when they were a ~*Big Deal*~ and not only was it only *as* effective as an equivalent-priced custom build, but it died prematurely.
Maybe they could have asked the Jewish players about [this](http://news.asiaone.com/A1MEDIA/news/09Sep11/others/20110930.203609_afp-legia.jpg)  I'm just playing devils advocate here. From what I've read I don't think Poland has a big problem with racism, more with hooliganism.
What brand/are those?
back....to the future! 
No, but your ad hominem attack on Jenny McCarthy smacked of someone defending the pharmaceutical firms—as if they were the good guys and we should never, ever question their judgment.  Well, many smart people question their judgment. Harvard University questions their judgment. Yale questions their judgment. The prestigious medical journal JAMA questions their judgment.  So it's not "random loons". Talk about straw men arguments.  "Anyone who questions 38 vaccines versus 11 is a loon! So what if if that's what we had in the 1990s and no mass extinction occurred? 38? Why not 48? 58? 108? The pharmaceutical corporations need to make more money. So keep the shots coming."  Talk about lunacy.  It's all about moderation. A little potassium is good for you. A *lot* pf potassium will kill you. A little aspirin will help your headache, a *lot* of aspirin will cause death.  This ridiculous premise that if a few shots is okay, than 58 will be even better is childlike. It's the logic of a simpleton.  If there were no mass extinctions back in the 1990s, then no one should be reviled, or held up to public excoriation for suggesting that we revisit that regimen.  It's not unreasonable.  If it's true what that article said--talking about the University of Pittsburgh's study of autism on monkeys--then we should all be shocked: No prior testing of the auto-immune response to a baby (with its weak immune system) being exposed to 8 pathogens in a single day had been done?  WTF!  No animal testing???  The FDA and the pharmaceutical corporations just pushed the new drugs under the brilliant reasoning that if a little is good, a whole lot could only be better?  As I said: That's a simpleton's logic.  And it's uttered in the accents of greed and corruption.
what do you mean by pop your hips exactly?
The show is good and all but the books are fantastic. He'd better finish em.
Thank you so much for giving me a heads up about public funding.
Grabbed the Amnesia code in the second link thanks.
LOL, there are two types of brown people. the FOB ones that are in my classes who are vapid as hell, and are virgins. and the wannabe bangers who live in surrey who are tough shit until you see them alone. pls go 
[You're a keeper!](http://www.youtuberepeat.com/watch/?v=Ip7YZ894th4)
Thanks for being reasonable! Good day to you sir!
I tend to say "car accident" if people overseas ask about it. They really do just randomly ask, makes me hate leaving the US sometimes.
Are you impotent?  That might explain why you don't get the joke.
I appreciate all the comments and tips. :D Edit: pic is from months back.. shorter beard http://imgur.com/KvSP7
Here are the three versions I made, all with varying effects. [Version 1](http://i.imgur.com/jTlR0.jpg)- Normal  [Version 2](http://i.imgur.com/86lMe.jpg)- Warmer, a little bit more retro [Version 3](http://i.imgur.com/dQDnJ.jpg)-Blue/green, nautical
If I can just say I never thought of Reddit as super hipsters until I found this thread now I picture everyone sitting behind their Apple laptops with big glasses beanies plaid and big fat beautiful beards. Thank you all so much
Road Trip! (From Texas.)
Mushrooms are amazingly cheap..? 
The Capitol Hill one, from my experience, just has a crazier parking lot and a lot more weirdos walking around. Also I think the Queen Anne one has interior seating. Might be the only one that's not just a drive-in.   I was in hospital up by Montlake Terrace for a week and the only thing about the experience that didn't suck was that the new Dick's in Edmonds was close by. 'So, I'm coming to visit. Want me to bring anything?' 'Two cheeseburgers and a chocolate shake please.'
I applied and mailed you on Reddit but no response yet :(
.... no?
would be a crazy finals but probably wont happen 
The largest single **voluntary** gathering of mourners in modern times.
I doubt well enough to please you... but that's not my goal.  I definitely can't draw hands or feet.  Here are some of my other doodles/sketches/drawings I've shared...you'll see realism isn't a goal of mine.  http://www.reddit.com/r/IDAP/search?q=guyanonymous&amp;restrict_sr=on  http://www.reddit.com/r/doodles/search?q=guyanonymous&amp;restrict_sr=on
Just like how it will never be Lupus :C
Thanks for the hint - I'll probably do this once I have enough gold to buy the thing.  We will keep it between you and me and reddit ;-)
It's amazing ...do you like younger guys?
It is, and it doesn't apply to the house of David. Apparently it was a later enactment that only applied to the Kings of Israel, and extended to the Hasmonean kings out of fear. TIL
was thinking about it...  decided against it
You know how when you drank too much and you think you're invincible, as if nothing can harm you? I noped the heck out of that link and there's no amount of alcohol to make me finish that video. G'night folks I'm done.
&gt;America has bigots in the government as well  Bigots in government who refer to ethnic groups as “criminal infiltrators infected with HIV”?  [citation needed]
I wish it had. 
SE off of 52nd, Woodstock area. 
Among those 800 things: If you are from the South/even a millimeter over to the Right of the political spectrum/enjoy country music/even an ounce religious/From Texas and unashamed/An American and unashamed/Support the military
It's an extremely overrated, nostalgia-driven feature. Of course this subreddit would love it.
Thank you captain obvious !
Nicely done.  My only contribution is that it's faster to TP then exit than it is to exit from the scene.
I actually played with my own hand to see if it worked the same. Can't tell through the skin though...
Do you mean sunglasses? 
JERRY, I love you! Answer all of our questions, please.
I can't believe I havn't see Beats by Dre in here.
the "drop" in Harlem Shake is fantastic.  What is so great about Disclosure is their ability to intertwine the bassline with the vocals, especially with [What's In Your Head](https://soundcloud.com/disclosuremusic/whats-in-your-head)
Hands down one of the greatest shows of all time   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mEH-TRwJwf4
Ex-JNCO employee here. I never sold a pair on the premise that they were *quality*.
You should have walked in, then knelt and said "BLOOD OF MY BLOOD"
I'm pretty much buying these bundles for the soundtracks at this point.
I dislike huge sugary drinks and the obese people they support as much as any health-conscious person, but I don't like the idea of banning them.  To what end?  Are we really going to ban every unhealthy food?  Might as well ban obese people instead.  Much more effective to promote a healthy lifestyle than to systematically prohibit everything which supports an unhealthy one.
Should have ties his feet to the chairs, too. Just sayin'.
You're pretty.
Hey there.. I'm currently out of the country teaching, but if you'd like maybe we can grab a coffee or whatever you're into. Redditors are always good company. Anyways, this is me! http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/udvbf/ive_been_teaching_english_in_spain_for_the_last/
[Full track of (what I assume is) the final version](http://fmitracks.com/2012/05/zedd-spectrum-feat-matthew-koma.html)
It's too...small
Subaru.com my friend :)
tank size? pH/temp/hardness/ammonia/nitrite/nitrate levels? what's in the tank, how long have you had it, is it cycled?
Define "speed pills". What brand exactly?
Reddit circle jerks are a bit different from real life circle jerks that you seem to be familiar with
More like one inch at a time... 
Have her talk to a doctor about Propranolol. Public speaking is my biggest fear, and I recently discovered this drug before I had to give my last speech and it completely took away all of the panic and anxiety. Best part is, it's not even really an anti-anxiety or anti-panic pill. There's really no side effects, and you aren't altered at all while you're on it. You take it about an hour before the speech and all it does is stop your body from reacting to adrenaline. No shaky voice, no pounding heart, no butterflies, nothing. I couldn't believe how well it worked.  Of course, the only way to really overcome a fear of public speaking is to do it over and over again. But this drug can definitely be a huge help in that endeavor.  Also, have her practice the speech tons of times before-hand.
I thought about not posting it here but then I thought fuck you. 
That's not how the burden of proof works.
Mom and Grandma get free services because they're not idiots and understand computers. Dad gets service if he doesn't yell, otherwise his shit stays broke.  Anyone else pays for service. Friend get tune ups for free when im bored with the understanding if they act up at all, a price appears. Worked good so far.
It's called Steam enhanced
OK. It finally started after about 5 minutes. Joined a game. 1 minute later the game froze and had to be restarted. Now its taking another eternity to load. This is hardly a fix. 
So I was just watching the teaser right before the show started, and they played "Real American," Hogans classic theme that I was pretty sure WWE had the rights to.  Can anyone clear this up? Is the song public domain or is TNA going to be facing another lawsuit? 
No, it's the dicks in corporate who make every damn employee more interested in selling you bullshit "extended warranties" than they are in training their employees to know their ass from their elbow that are the problem.
Haha good idea. She may have won the battle,but the war is not over
IS THIS PLEASURABLE 
No, a downvote is not stifling.
Yes I am also unable to download the new patch. I go into the log in screen and it tells me to download the new patch. The game auto minimizes to begin but then it says "Diablo 3 has stopped working" and nothing happenes beyond that. When I try to close everything and reopen Diablo it just says everything is up-to-date.
Willpower, as with anything. Instead of eating some ice cream or a bag of chips, snack on some fruit, nuts, or even a PB&amp;J sandwich. Personally I like to smoke at night and by then I am not supposed to be eating anything anyways. I'll have a bottle of water or some soda to get rid of the pasties.
Holy shit!  This PSA and the "I'm not a chicken, you're a turkey" PSA are the reasons I credit for why I **do** drugs!
&gt;As your formula shows, natural selection is a lot messier and is very unlikely to make a good choice except when the change in fitness is very drastic.  This formula shows what happens in large scales and over long periods of time. Natural selection is actually incredibly clean over those periods- it's only when you try to look at things at the individual level that it becomes messy. On the timescales and population levels for human populations, the equations clearly show that small changes in fitness have large effects and are much more likely to go to fixation. So absolutely not: those equations clearly show how small changes persist and have an effect over a long period of time.   &gt;They're so rare that it's not going to make a difference.   The concept of a [selective sweep](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Selective_sweep) would be good for you to see. Rare beneficial mutations *zoom* through the gene pool. Common deleterious ones trudge, and have to compete against the far more common neutral alleles, and usually wither and die. Think in terms of populations, not individuals. Even though beneficial mutations are rare, they are extremely important.  &gt;plant geneticist John Sanford  Given that he's a creationist and his theories are pretty roundly rejected by his peers, you're going to have to do better than a quote from that guy. What source is that from?  Anyway, even accepting that statement, note that this is about *crop improvement*, not an increase in fitness. These two things are pretty much in no way related. In fact, when it comes to domesticated crops, "fitness" really doesn't even apply anymore. Domesticated crops are already way at the edge of what's possible; they've had thousands of years of selective pressure from humans applied already. Even if mutations didn't increase crop yields, all that seems to show is that crops are as highly optimized for yield as you're going to get.  Try the same thing with, say, bacteria. Guess what happens every time we come up with new antibiotics? They evolve, and the beneficial mutations of antibiotic resistance explode throughout local populations. This is how drug resistance works.  &gt;Bergman (2004) has studied the topic of beneficial mutations. Among other things, he did a simple literature search via Biological Abstracts and Medline. He found 453,732 ‘mutation’ hits, but among these only 186 mentioned the word ‘beneficial’ (about 4 in 10,000). When those 186 references were reviewed, almost all the presumed ‘beneficial mutations’ were only beneficial in a very narrow sense.  You don't think this might be because, say, most studies are done on genetic diseases and other harmful mutations because they're more interesting to us? Again, note what I said earlier: *everything that works in us was a beneficial mutation at one point.* Try looking up a paper that measures rates of beneficial spontaneous mutation or something similar. [Here's a random one that I found with 5 seconds of google](http://www.genetics.org/content/185/4/1397.full.pdf). In that Google search, I also turned up [this](http://letterstocreationists.wordpress.com/stan-3-3/) website, which seems to say a lot of what I want to about the definition of "fitness" and "beneficial" and what it means for mutations and evolution.  &gt;Wikipedia [1] provides a list of those that have achieved enough fixation to be noted in medical journals.  "Fixation" is a technical term. It means that an allele has so dominated as population that no other alleles exist. Not a single one of these mutations are fixed in any relevant sense, except perhaps in extremely specific populations of humans.  &gt;I await your response with the tally of entries in the database of human superpowers  If you want superhuman powers, I can list several people. Lance Armstrong, for example, or Michael Phelps. Examine their bodies, and you find things like massive hearts. Albert Einstein's brain also has certain features that are presumably genetic. I'm not sure how much those increased fitness, though- fitness is not measured by ability, but by reproductive success. Einstein, as intelligent as he was, was probably less fit than the average individual.  &gt;But, the problem is that even the fittest members are accumulating deleterious mutations, and everyone suffers in a different way.  Once again, that's not a problem. If you argument is that mutational load increases indefinitely until a population collapses, I've already explained why that's simply not true. With math. Everybody has deleterious mutations, a few of them are fixed, and that's just peachy. Other evolutionary forces balance it out.  &gt;This is a circular argument. We're debating whether humans evolved from apes, and you're using "since we evolved from apes" in your premise.  What you're doing is saying "evolution can't explain X," and I'm saying "yeah, it can." That means I get to use stuff in evolutionary theory. You're trying to attack a perceived weakness in evolutionary theory- I can use other parts of it to explain why this isn't a weakness.
The point, as I interpret it, was that certain elements of our societies and institutions have shifted to be dangerously hostile to men, and that *this is not OK.* The fact that men used to get away with abusing women was horrible. The fact that men used to be able to leave women penniless in a separation was horrible. The fact that women can now drop a police hammer on innocent men is horrible. The fact that women can now leave men bankrupt and childless in a divorce is horrible. Horribleness is not a vector; these wrongs do not cancel each other out because they are being exchanged, they only compound.  Equality is the goal; retribution is no less awful than the original offense.
sure giving 34% instead of 100% increase is disappointing and Riot shouldn't give so many details if they aren t sur themselves about what they are actually gonna do. But still, they are going to release Draven soon, with double IP boost just before that, the number of queue dodges would have been awful and ofc riot would have earned less money. And i think they deserve this money. Remember the number of hours you ve played LoL without HAVING TO pay for anything, if you did, it was your own choice. Stop taking everything for granted.
I was looking around and was thinking about that. Thank you!
No offense dude but telling the general public he doesnt/cant own guns isnt a good thing considering you said he may be being stalked.
As a community, we do actually deserve it. Riot asked for something that gives them gain. Likes on Facebook have a direct impact on awareness of their game to people on Facebook which is a whole lot of people. People are giving them advertising for this prize. Even if they ask for us to do something that doesn't give them any actual gain if we do what they ask we deserve what they promised to us. Saying that people don't deserve it just seems kind of douchebaggy since we actually did them a favor and gave them advertising for this prize.
[laughing]  So am I. Born and raised in the good ol' US of A.
Good luck to you!
Head straight to the ministry of finance.  That girl is hot!
I'm not saying there are degrees of sin. I never said that or implied that so I don't now why you keep thinning that is relevant.
no no, from his priest. 
I enter my authenticator about once a month in game. Anytime I go to blizzard's website and do *anything* with my account, I have to enter in my authenticator.
There has never been a more unnecessary article than this
My Spanish II instructor made me say "kitty litter kitty litter kitty litter" over and over but it never helped. 
He like-a tha fatties?
You may want to grab a napkin and clean up the mess for starters. 
Others have written really good responses here, so just a quick note. The question you've asked here is the reason that [Herodotus](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Herodotus) is simultaneously called the "Father of history" and more derisively the "Father of lies." He took pains -- or so he says -- to try to separate fact from fiction in the stories he was told concerning distant lands, people, and important political successions. If a story seemed too outlandish, he commented and said so, and yet at the same time it's become obvious that other things he was willing to accept as factual were not in fact the truth. We are actually still making archaeological discoveries right now that both add to and detract from Herodotus' reliability, so -- regardless of whether you believe him or not -- you can't count him out.  At the same time, how and what he wrote, regardless of whether it was true, is an important clue concerning what an educated Greek might have known of the world during his time. No matter how unreliable *any* writer is, they're still a product of their culture and their time, and sometimes it's just as interesting to see what someone is tempted to lie about and why.  Herodotus and his time aren't my area of specialty, but he's often used as a quick introduction to budding historians as an example of the fundamental problems we have writing history.
Why do I not remember this.
It just seems that a standalone microphone for the same price as a webcam with a mic is a much better deal when the only concern is sound quality.
[](/rarityyell) HELLO CRIMSON BRISTLE, I AM THE MAGICAL COUCH. YOU HAVE THE CHANCE TO BE THE FIRST TO KNOW WHO I AM. HOW DO YOU DO? 
I think they are doing an excellent job balancing shotguns out in this patch, obviously we have yet to actually see them in action but it looks like the auto shotguns aren't going to be quite so spammy, the m1014 will finally have a place, and the 870 will be even better with the slight ROF buff and better suppressed performance.
Yeah I see your point. However, I was equally considering the fact that (correct me if I'm wrong) Morello said that there was going the be the implementation of the champ select chat in the tribunal cases, which could perhaps help with the problem of people genuinely having connection issues and those that just don't like the picks/other players? Just more thoughts haha
oh and i only have the black on now.
I have a hard time taking this seriously when the author doesn't even know something basic like how Taric's heal works.
They still do. [I tested it yesterday with the latest versionn.](http://www.reddit.com/r/dwarffortress/comments/ucu5s/stagnant_water_remaining_stagnant/c4ucmc5)
Stick to these guns man. As an experienced ableton user I find most video tutorials full of garbage. I just want to know in as few words as possible how to do the thing.
Yeah, sorry for the initial rant. I only use it for CSS QA and I hadn't finagled with the preferences enough to know if there was a way to simplify it. 
Absolutely, yes. He doesn't make any money of it, that's for sure. 
I was born in the USA in 1988 with American AND German citizenship because my mother is German. Its passed down through parents. 
I was on too, so was most people.
Your neck should be raped with a knife.
"Excuse me, can you touch your thumb and pinkie together and bend your wrist? Now can I look? No? Dammit."
This was made under the influence of many things over the past 2.5 years. Guess which ones? There are definite parts that tie together with a particular altering substance.
Here's the thing you aren't paying for someone else's bills. Yes you pay taxes, and medicare  ect ect like the rest of us, but until you pay Fatty McGee's bill DIRECTLY, you don't have a say in jack shit on what that person does in their own life.   Once again, a completely stupid ban that does nothing but inconvenience retailers and one that's easily sidestepped. Just the fact that he has spent time wasting in the contemplation of this bill is more of a waste of your taxpayer dollars then Fatty McGee's 60oz cup of pop. 
I was expecting to scroll down and see "extra flannel" or something, but instead, I got Hatsune Miku. Thank you for making my day, because none of my friends appreciate Vocaloid :)
Agreed. I would buy them in black.
It's anxiety. It's frustration. It's hurt. It's a million things rolled into one.   Mostly the bad things were needing to vent. And my boyfriend and I talked before he left for work and we said we wanted to talk to her tonight. If she goes about this the mature way and helps us find a replacement that is one thing. If she gives us notice and plans on paying for what she owes that is grand and I will be thankful. But if she thinks she is going to just walk away and not do what any friend would expect from another friend I will not tolerate it. I don't need a friend who doesn't care about other people.   I understand that we are all looking out for numero uno but friendship is a promise to help each other out and not go behind peoples backs. As far as our friendship is concerned right now before the talk we are cool as a cucumber. But again if she is rude or has been deceitful in anyway I won't tolerate it. 
I'm just going to go out on a limb here and say I really hate your tattoos. They are ugly and cheesy. The rest of you is not.
Alex Gonzales.  Todd Hundley.  Neifi Fucking Perez.  Dusty "If you're under 30 and not a weak hitting MI, you wont play more than once a week" Baker.
as a proud infidel, i must point out christians don't keep their girls uneducated, or kill them if they're raped. or throw acid at them without fear of consequeces.
Oh wait... 
How exactly was Chris Benoit a monster?
Well... obviously...?
They're better! In my experience, more frosting, better shape.
And as a human being, I can confirm I would dump you in a heartbeat if you tried it.
That is a great site. I use it a lot. Sadly, the waypoint optimization is disabled when you get over 10 waypoints.
LOVE Emma Goldman. 
The polish is there, it's just the kind of things you don't notice. Our brains are wired to maintain focus on things that annoy us, so when something is smooth and good you don't appreciate them until you lose them.
Great read about a strong woman. Hopefully she isn't just having another string of words put into her mouth to further someone else's agenda. 
That's what Azmodan uses to fuel his forges.
Thanks. :)  Takeoff is pretty stable, I meant to add wings to the first stage but things seem fine without them.  Where I went wrong was I came in with too much horizontal speed and the lander fell apart upon landing.  I think ill get it on the next try.
Practice practice practice! And show us the results :)
Yeah Python is not a bad place to start. I don't have a really good idea of what book to start with. You could look at PHP too perhaps. They fall into the category of scripting languages. They are actual programming languages, as opposed to say, HTML, which is not. Learn the basics first - variables, conditionals, loops, methods and go from there.
I'll be back tomorrow, quiet_eyes.
My neighbors used to run their cars for about 20 minutes in the morning to let them warm up...with the headlights on high pointed into my living room. Try sleeping on the couch through that.
big lady from happy wheels, nice
Well that cause tarecgosa Is a female so when you turn into her they know u as tarecgosa cause at that moment you are a female. ( if that makes sense) 
Stannis is a JERK, and the definition of Lawful Neutral, but he is NOT a pussy.
There is a Sports City in the basement of the Grand Gateway in Xujiahui. I'm not sure if they have your size, but it is a place definitely worth checking out for sporting goods.
Thanks for this post. Have been on the fence about dropping $40 on one of those guys (I know it's nothing compared to a Wacom but I am flat broke these days) and you just convinced me it's worth it.
Only pen i've ever made an extra effort to not lose 
[69 Comments!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=KvBEPdWxGa8) 
Conversations you two have had, how you both have changed together as you grew up, just the most interesting encounters you have had with him 
Please dont refer to cum in a box...
First, your parents marriage is their own to deal with.  You should not feel at all swayed by their transparent attempt to manipulate you with them remaining together. Second, ask yourself **HONESTLY** are you prepared to live without your family members who are opposed to this relationship for the rest of the time you're seeing this woman? You can only control your half of the relationship with your family. You've said it yourself you will not change your fathers mind or the family's position on this.  So that leaves it to you to make the decision as to which is more important to you: being with your GF or having a relationship with your family. Fuck what everyone else says you have to go with how **YOU FEEL** here.  Its easy for Reddit to armchair this and say "Fuck your family, your dad is a racist prick, you don't need him" because we do not have to deal with the consequences. It doesn't make you racist or an asshole if you choose your family and it doesn't make you better than anyone if you choose her over your family.  Either way you lose. So do what will make you happy and ignore everyone else.
This is likely the best thing to come out of FF13.
I can speak from experience that many children would rather not read at all than read the classics.  Reading something, even if it is full of fragments and slang, is better than reading nothing, and in my case set the stage for me returning to the classics when I was older and not being forced to do so.
Definitely emotionally stronger.
Mine isn't a projectile vomiter, but we also had no real reason to try to burp her after every feeding. If she was fussy or crying after eating, she may need to burp, but that has only happened to us once a day/couple days. Generally she doesn't need to burp.
Ah, Home stuck references.
I saw this a while ago and thought the same thing. I'm inclined to believe this is staged. 
you need to grind your bud up more for a more consistent vape. also i think you underpacked that trench.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Y_96MfxE4jk I like this because of the awkward guy singing beside them that you can randomly hear, the floating beach ball/people, the beginning kick and the crowd
Oh my god yes. "Kissing is like biting, only somebody wins!"
Yes.. I would get the Nikon 70-200 VR I. Sigma's 50mm and 85mm are phenomenal, but their 70-200 just hunts in low light. 
Just list your major's GPA.  It's the best one of the three anyway.  Listing all 3 is too much.  Put your graduation date on the right for consistency.  Don't bother putting the college's URL.  You have nothing like a branding statement - see FAQs.  Nothing at the top saying what you have to offer, in what kind of environment you want to work or have skills...you don't even mention in your post what job you want.  This makes it very difficult to know how to target your responsibilities.  Combine work experience and internships as per Tr0gd0r's suggestion.  Stop writing 'actively participated'.  It's repetitive.  You don't need a blank line under 'campus activities'.  Fit it all on one page.  Put your skills closer to the top so they are read quicker.
I'm not sure why this fix isn't more widely known, but this worked for me: http://battlelog.battlefield.com/bf3/forum/threadview/2832654347729882788/  PC only... sorry console players :(
&gt;&gt; anti-LDS.  That's the problem isn't it?  They believe they are the true branch of Mormonism which includes the LDS acronym.   We could keep redefining what someone is against to move them out of our group, but so could evangelicals when defining Christianity.  &gt;&gt; BTW why did you guys change the name from RLDS to CoC?  I'm not part of the RLDS, but [you can listen to someone who is](http://mormonexpression.com/2012/03/19/episode-192-myths-concerning-the-community-of-christ/).  It's pretty educational. 
I love Troy and Abed's friendship, but I think they're focusing way too much on it. I'd love to see more Troy plots that involve other characters like we saw in the episode in the pictures. I don't ship them, but I'd like another Troy/Annie plot. A Troy/Jeff episode - anything other than Troy/Abed. I love when they experiment and throw different paitings together to see what happens.
Except that while there are some Whole Foods locations in Canada, Trader Joes has yet to make its way up here! :(
I think the Nixie tubes are still hard to come by and are (therefore) expensive. Check Peter Jensen's website.
Zuko would have had his scar.
I don't necessarily think the jars are comical, and I find the skill to be pretty damn awesome. It's just that it is, perhaps, *too* awesome, sort of like the Barbarians' Leap.  Leap looks badass, but if you were using those as your left click ability to spam on enemies, you'd just be hop-hop-hopping and it'd be just awkward.
Him, I would do him for a Klondike Bar.
That is one sick minivan
i know right implying that them growing up in new york would automatically warrant them street smarts
pretty sure Harper is destroying environmental regulation just for Alberta.
When the fuck did I say anything about Romney? All I said was what every sane person has said which is that Ron Paul lost and has no future. Get over it. He lost and will never be president.   I'm not a Romney fan but how the fuck can you argue that a candidate who didn't win a SINGLE POPULAR VOTE be a legitimate candidate while arguing that the presumptive nominee is a fringe candidate? I'm not a fan of him and didnt vote for him but he won and Paul lost. So get over it. 
The website says "dream on" which would be the silly bit... but you're probably home now
KRANG APPROVES
apply the razor directly to the wrists.
No, it means a federal government with the necessary authority, for example as described by milkg. I have to disappoint you if you think there is some sort of German conspiracy to take over Europe. German politicians are not smart enough for something like that. 
GODDAMMIT NOT THE CAAT
They'll start to sell more when they rename themselves "Okay, Some Frills"
Looks like a young tree... madrone?
Houstonian here! I remember your profile standing out some months ago because of the reddit mention, plus you're really cute. Funny seeing you here (I hope this doesn't sound creepy). Good profile, but I agree with the others it might need a bit of trimming. 
Fuck you Junior!!  National Team here I come!
Weird, just got the urge to watch this on Monday (Memorial Day Observed in the US).  I had never seen the full video before.  It was a good way to spend 19 minutes. 
TIL ^^  I actually did not know that at all. Thank You! =]
Chest hair &gt; matching t shirt by a million percent. 
I would think that it's because it's relatively new in terms of societal and commercial popularity. Colloquial language tends to 'progress'--not in terms of academic value or intelligence level but rather pertaining to a language's users' need for something new--but many people, especially with swear words, get tired of the same old same old. This is why many people find unique or creative ways to swear to be hilarious (talking more about film right here). The word 'cunt' does imply degradation towards women, but so too does the word 'bitch', and yet one is considered more severe than the other. The more a swear word is used, the less intense its meaning and/or connotation becomes. Words, like fashion trends, go in and out of style, and swear words are no different. 
